Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0861.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the legislature, the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


executive, the department of the attorney general, the department
of state, the department of treasury, the department of technology,
management, and budget, the department of civil rights, and certain
state purposes related to those branches and departments for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
TOTAL GENERAL GOVERNMENT
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 44.0
Full-time equated classified positions 7,772.2
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,241,889,200
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 1,251,385,600
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,990,503,600
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 45,421,400
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 19,298,900
Total private revenues 1,903,600
Total other state restricted revenues 2,788,797,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,135,081,900
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 699.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 139,581,300
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 39,899,600
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 99,681,700
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 10,710,500
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 961,400
Total other state restricted revenues 36,118,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 51,891,700
(2) ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATIONS
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 699.0
Attorney general $ 112,500
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 1,022,900
Alcohol and gambling enforcement division--FTEs 17.0 2,926,300
Asssistance with convictions and expungements--
FTEs 30.0 4,734,600
Child elder family financial crimes division--
FTEs 20.5 5,154,400
Child support enforcement division--FTEs 25.0 4,141,300
Children and youth services division--FTEs 28.0 5,392,700
Civil rights and elections--FTEs 12.0 2,485,100
Collections--FTEs 15.5 2,818,800
Corporate oversight division--FTEs 68.0 10,273,300
Corrections--FTEs 40.0 7,809,500
Criminal appellate division--FTEs 17.0 2,421,600
Criminal investigations--FTEs 46.0 3,888,700
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Criminal trials--FTEs 37.0 10,824,500
Detective sergeants-Attorney General special
investigators 1,300,000
Environment, natural resources, and agriculture
division--FTEs 34.0 7,699,300
Executive office--FTEs 7.0 1,313,100
Finance division--FTEs 11.0 2,414,400
Fiscal management--FTEs 9.0 1,284,500
Health care fraud division--FTEs 35.0 7,147,900
Health education and family services--FTEs 36.0 5,881,900
Human resources--FTEs 7.0 1,135,500
Labor division--FTEs 34.0 6,159,000
Licensing and regulation division--FTEs 38.0 5,014,900
Office of communications--FTEs 9.0 1,193,200
Office of legislative affairs--FTEs 2.0 422,100
Operation survivor justice 1,000,000
Opinions review board--FTE 1.0 332,300
Public administration--FTEs 3.0 427,700
Public service division--FTEs 14.0 2,509,600
Revenue and tax--FTEs 27.0 5,690,100
Sexual assault law enforcement--FTEs 5.0 2,507,100
Solicitor general--FTEs 4.0 1,697,900
Special litigation--FTEs 5.0 2,126,100
State operations--FTEs 42.0 8,696,200
Transportation--FTEs 10.0 2,579,300
Victim rights/victim services--FTEs 10.0 1,368,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 133,906,900
Appropriated from:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDOC 745,700
IDG from MDE 832,000
IDG from EGLE 2,468,400
IDG from MDHHS, health policy 332,100
IDG from MDHHS, human services 7,049,000
IDG from MDHHS, medical services administration 792,000
IDG from MDHHS, WIC 380,100
IDG from MDIFS, financial and insurance
services 1,644,800
IDG from LEO, Michigan occupational safety and
health administration 213,100
IDG from LEO, workforce development 102,300
IDG from MDLARA, cannabis regulatory agency 2,562,700
IDG from MDLARA, fireworks safety fund 92,300
IDG from MDLARA, health professions 3,187,600
IDG from MDLARA, licensing and regulation fees 803,700
IDG from MDLARA, remonumentation fees 118,600
IDG from MDLARA, securities fees 788,600
IDG from MDLARA, unlicensed builders 1,209,000
IDG from MDMVA 185,100
IDG from MDOS, children's protection registry 45,000
IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation
fund 112,600
IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 196,900
IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 2,269,800
IDG from MDSP 291,400
IDG from MDTMB 1,371,100
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


IDG from MDTMB, civil service commission 347,900
IDG from MDTMB, risk management revolving fund 1,424,900
IDG from MILEAP 1,024,500
IDG from Michigan state housing development
authority 1,305,800
IDG from Michigan strategic fund 203,800
IDG from treasury 7,798,800
Federal revenues:
DAG, state administrative match grant/food
stamps 137,000
Federal funds 3,858,500
HHS, medical assistance, medigrant 425,900
HHS-OS, state Medicaid fraud control units 6,289,100
Special revenue funds:
Unadjudicated criminal property seizures 961,400
Antitrust enforcement collections 869,600
Attorney general's operations fund 1,127,800
Attorney general support fund 8,112,200
Auto repair facilities fees 376,900
Franchise fees 434,900
Game and fish protection account 693,300
Human trafficking commission fund 170,000
Lawsuit settlement proceeds fund 8,225,100
Liquor purchase revolving fund 1,673,900
Michigan employment security act -
administrative fund 2,550,700
Michigan merit award trust fund 550,800
Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund 203,100
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Mobile home code fund 278,600
Prisoner reimbursement 804,300
Public utility assessments 2,255,900
Reinstatement fees 293,600
Retirement funds 1,184,600
Second injury fund 680,500
Self-insurers security fund 414,700
Silicosis and dust disease fund 119,800
State building authority revenue 135,100
State casino gaming fund 2,018,700
State lottery fund 397,800
Utility consumer representation fund 1,974,300
Waterways account 156,300
Worker's compensation administrative revolving
fund 415,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 46,217,300
(3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 1,724,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,724,400
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,724,400
(4) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Legal aid and technical assistance program 1,950,000
Utility rate case oversight 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,950,000
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,950,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 168.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 29,444,300
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 29,444,300
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 3,435,200
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 18,700
Total other state restricted revenues 58,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 25,931,900
(2) CIVIL RIGHTS OPERATIONS
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 168.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 895,900
Complaint investigation and enforcement--FTEs 112.0 18,804,800
Disability rights and compliance--FTEs 11.0 1,729,000
Division on deaf, deaf/blind, and hard of
hearing--FTEs 6.0 773,100
Executive office--FTEs 25.0 3,330,300
Public affairs--FTEs 14.0 2,354,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 27,887,100
Appropriated from:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Federal revenues:
EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency
contracts 1,768,500
HUD, grant 1,651,700
Special revenue funds:
Private revenues 18,700
State restricted indirect funds 58,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 24,389,700
(3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 1,557,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,557,200
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency
contracts 15,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,542,200
Sec. 104. EXECUTIVE OFFICE
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0
Full-time equated classified positions 86.2
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 0
Special revenue funds:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 0
State general fund/general purpose $ 9,609,200
(2) EXECUTIVE OFFICE OPERATIONS
Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0
Full-time equated classified positions 86.2
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 8.0 $ 1,670,500
Governor 159,300
Lieutenant governor 111,600
Executive office--FTEs 86.2 7,667,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,609,200
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 9,609,200
Sec. 105. LEGISLATURE
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 235,324,800
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 7,668,300
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 227,656,500
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 0
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 474,700
Total other state restricted revenues 8,092,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 219,089,500
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(2) LEGISLATURE
Senate $ 51,298,900
Senate automated data processing 3,242,100
Senate fiscal agency 5,054,500
House of representatives 75,337,200
House automated data processing 3,242,100
House fiscal agency 5,054,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 143,229,300
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 143,229,300
(3) LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Legislative corrections ombudsman $ 1,657,900
Legislative council 17,221,200
Legislative service bureau automated data
processing 3,880,800
Michigan veterans facility ombudsman 385,300
National association dues 735,700
Office of tribal legislative liaison 522,700
Sentencing commission 100
Worker's compensation 185,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 24,588,900
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 24,588,900
(4) LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT SYSTEM
Actuarially determined contribution $ 100
General nonretirement expenses 6,521,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,521,100
Appropriated from:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Special revenue funds:
Court fees 1,483,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,037,800
(5) PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
Binsfeld Office Building and other properties $ 10,313,400
Cora Anderson Building 7,135,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 17,448,600
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 17,448,600
(6) STATE CAPITOL HISTORIC SITE
Bond/lease obligations $ 100
General operations 6,858,600
Restoration, renewal, and maintenance 4,020,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,879,200
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Private - gifts and bequests 474,700
Capitol historic site fund 4,020,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 6,384,000
(7) OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL
Unclassified positions--FTEs $ 453,200
Field operations 32,204,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,657,700
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG, commercial mobile radio system emergency
telephone fund 47,000
IDG, contract audit administration fees 86,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


IDG, deferred compensation funds 118,500
IDG, emp ben div postemployment life insurance
benefit 24,100
IDG from LEO, self-insurers security fund 101,500
IDG from MDHHS, human services 39,900
IDG from MDLARA, liquor purchase revolving fund 137,700
IDG from MDMVA, Michigan veterans facility
authority 109,700
IDG from MDOT, comprehensive transportation
fund 49,200
IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 399,800
IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 38,700
IDG from MDOT, state trunkline fund 928,600
IDG, legislative retirement system 32,900
IDG, Michigan economic development corporation 159,700
IDG, Michigan education trust fund 76,700
IDG, Michigan finance authority 323,800
IDG, Michigan justice training commission fund 61,800
IDG, Michigan strategic fund 261,400
IDG, office of retirement services 938,200
IDG, other restricted funding sources 27,600
IDG, Pension schedules of employer allocations
funds 127,700
IDG, single audit act 3,489,200
IDG, state sponsored group insurance fund 88,600
Special revenue funds:
21st century jobs trust fund 122,200
Brownfield development fund 35,700
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Game and fish protection account 39,800
MDTMB, civil service commission 225,300
Michigan state housing development authority
fees 143,900
Michigan veterans' trust fund 2,100
Michigan veterans' trust fund income and
assessments 23,700
Motor transport revolving fund 9,300
Office services revolving fund 12,900
State disbursement unit, office of child
support 72,600
State services fee fund 1,886,700
Waterways account 14,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 22,400,900
Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF STATE
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 1,601.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 299,487,300
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 20,000,000
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 279,487,300
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 1,460,000
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 50,100
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Total other state restricted revenues 266,798,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 11,179,200
(2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 126.0
Secretary of state $ 112,500
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 5.0 853,100
Executive direction--FTEs 28.0 5,246,600
Operations--FTEs 98.0 27,404,800
Property management 11,668,900
Worker's compensation 125,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,411,300
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Abandoned vehicle fees 239,800
Auto repair facilities fees 125,800
Children's protection registry fund 274,400
Driver fees 2,593,300
Enhanced driver license and enhanced official
state personal identification card fund 2,175,700
Personal identification card fees 101,900
Scrap tire fund 78,600
Transportation administration collection fund 38,537,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,284,400
(3) LEGAL SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 179.0
Operations--FTEs 179.0 $ 26,008,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,008,500
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Auto repair facilities fees 3,305,800
Driver education provider and instructor fund 150,000
Driver fees 1,658,500
Enhanced driver license and enhanced official
state personal identification card fund 2,957,700
Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 598,500
Transportation administration collection fund 16,374,600
Vehicle theft prevention fees 757,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 205,800
(4) CUSTOMER DELIVERY SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 1,216.0
Branch operations--FTEs 888.0 $ 102,019,600
Central operations--FTEs 326.0 54,862,100
Digital ID 100,000
Motorcycle safety education administration--
FTEs 2.0 657,600
Motorcycle safety education grants 2,100,000
Organ donor program 129,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 159,868,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 20,000,000
Federal revenues:
DOT 860,000
OHSP 600,000
Special revenue funds:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Private funds 100
Thomas Daley gift of life fund 50,000
Abandoned vehicle fees 450,900
Auto repair facilities fees 763,700
Child support clearance fees 100,000
Driver fees 22,881,500
Driver improvement course fund 800,000
Enhanced driver license and enhanced official
state personal identification card fund 14,671,600
Expedient service fees 3,014,100
Marine safety fund 1,596,300
Michigan state police auto theft fund 123,000
Mobile home commission fees 512,800
Motorcycle safety and education awareness fund 350,000
Motorcycle safety fund 2,107,600
Off-road vehicle title fees 170,700
Parking ticket court fines 518,400
Personal identification card fees 2,399,500
Recreation passport fee revenue 1,000,000
Reinstatement fees - operator licenses 1,028,200
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 390,000
Transportation administration collection fund 83,606,600
Vehicle theft prevention fees 786,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,087,400
(5) ELECTION REGULATION
Full-time equated classified positions 80.0
County clerk education and training fund $ 100,000
Election administration and services--FTEs 80.0 28,820,800
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Fees to local units 109,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 29,030,600
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Election administration support fund 20,255,500
Notary education and training fund 100,000
Notary fee fund 200,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 8,475,100
(6) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 39,168,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,168,500
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Administrative order processing fee 11,800
Auto repair facilities fees 129,800
Driver fees 789,600
Enhanced driver license and enhanced official
state personal identification card fund 2,066,300
Expedient service fees 803,300
Personal identification card fees 174,000
Transportation administration collection fund 34,885,500
Vehicle theft prevention fees 181,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 126,500
Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT,
AND BUDGET
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 3,269.5
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,785,374,200
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 1,171,532,000
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 613,842,200
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 4,493,300
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 3,094,600
Total private revenues 354,400
Total other state restricted revenues 149,227,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 456,672,700
(2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 930.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,168,600
Administrative services--FTEs 155.0 24,811,800
Budget and financial management--FTEs 199.0 14,441,500
Building operation services--FTEs 275.0 117,038,000
Business support services--FTEs 108.0 18,053,600
Design and construction services--FTEs 54.0 10,011,600
Executive operations--FTEs 33.5 5,760,000
Michigan center for data and analytics--FTEs 42.0 8,970,700
Motor vehicle fleet--FTEs 39.0 107,598,800
Office of the state employer--FTEs 10.0 1,045,200
Property management 9,007,500
State archives--FTEs 14.5 2,339,800
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Statewide integrated government management
application 12,032,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 332,279,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from accounting service centers user
charges 6,937,300
IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 119,583,000
IDG from MDHHS, human services 759,100
IDG from MDLARA 100,000
IDG from motor transport fund 107,598,800
IDG from technology user fees 11,753,700
IDG from user fees 10,101,800
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 4,493,200
Special revenue funds:
Local funds 35,000
Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 22,800
Private funds 354,300
Health management funds 443,200
HR-1 costs fund 1,950,000
Other agency charges 1,329,600
SIGMA user fees 2,156,100
Special revenue, internal service, and pension
trust funds 25,785,900
State restricted indirect funds 3,684,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 35,191,100
(3) TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Full-time equated classified positions 1,670.5
Enterprise user experience--FTEs 14.0 $ 4,292,600
Homeland security initiative/cyber security--
FTEs 58.0 29,136,500
Information technology services--FTEs 1,446.5 908,865,400
Michigan public safety communications system--
FTEs 152.0 51,907,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 994,201,900
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from technology user fees 908,865,400
Special revenue funds:
Local - MPSCS subscriber and maintenance fees 3,036,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 82,299,800
(4) STATEWIDE APPROPRIATIONS
Professional development fund - AFSCME $ 50,000
Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU,
scientific and engineering unit 100,000
Professional development fund - MPE, SEIU,
technical unit 50,000
Professional development fund - NEREs 200,000
Professional development fund - UAW 700,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,100,000
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from employer contributions 1,100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(5) SPECIAL PROGRAMS
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Full-time equated classified positions 199.0
Capital city services $ 1,000,000
Make it in Michigan 400
Office of the child advocate--FTEs 22.0 4,073,100
Property management executive/legislative 1,560,800
Retirement services--FTEs 177.0 30,700,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,335,000
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 100
Special revenue funds:
Local funds 100
Private funds 100
Deferred compensation 5,347,200
Make it in Michigan competitiveness fund 100
Pension trust funds 25,260,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 6,726,900
(6) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT
State building authority rent - community
colleges $ 40,398,900
State building authority rent - state agencies 82,133,900
State building authority rent - universities 153,218,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 275,751,700
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 275,751,700
(7) CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION
Full-time equated classified positions 470.0
Agency services--FTEs 113.0 $ 18,528,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Employee benefits--FTEs 29.0 6,747,500
Executive direction--FTEs 35.0 10,022,200
Human resources operations--FTEs 293.0 40,345,800
Information technology services and projects 12,222,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 87,866,200
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
State restricted funds 1% 35,077,800
State restricted indirect funds 14,482,600
State sponsored group insurance 11,556,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 26,749,600
(8) CAPITAL OUTLAY
Major special maintenance, remodeling, and
addition for state agencies 3,800,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,800,000
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from building occupancy charges 3,800,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(9) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 53,040,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 53,040,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from building occupancy and parking charges 723,200
IDG from user fees 209,700
Special revenue funds:
Deferred compensation 2,600
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Pension trust funds 15,323,000
SIGMA user fees 2,037,700
Special revenue, internal service, and pension
trust funds 2,706,500
State restricted indirect funds 2,083,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 29,953,600
Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0
Full-time equated classified positions 1,948.5
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,743,068,100
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 12,285,700
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATIONS $ 2,730,782,400
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 25,322,400
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 16,204,300
Total private revenues 44,300
Total other state restricted revenues 2,328,503,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 360,707,700
(2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0
Full-time equated classified positions 460.5
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 10.0 $ 1,350,400
Bureau of accounting and financial services--
FTEs 75.0 10,218,700
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Bureau of operational excellence--FTEs 27.0 4,437,300
Collections services bureau--FTEs 189.0 29,595,500
Enterprise services--FTEs 77.0 10,020,500
Executive direction and operations--FTEs 33.5 4,648,200
Office of security and data risk management--
FTEs 27.0 4,114,400
Property management 6,307,100
Unclaimed property--FTEs 32.0 5,824,000
Worker's compensation 19,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 76,535,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG, data/collection services fees 339,100
IDG, accounting service center user charges 424,900
IDG, MDHHS, title IV-D 846,500
IDG, levy/warrant cost assessment fees 3,774,400
IDG, state agency collection fees 2,574,100
Federal revenues:
DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 518,800
DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1995 insured
loans 555,600
Special revenue funds:
Delinquent tax collection revenue 41,975,500
Escheats revenue 5,824,000
Garnishment fees 2,915,500
Justice system fund 458,800
Marihuana regulation fund 1,314,300
Marihuana regulatory fund 197,300
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


MFA, bond and loan program revenue 690,700
State lottery fund 337,200
State restricted indirect funds 288,900
State services fee fund 384,500
Treasury fees 47,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 12,927,400
(3) LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS
Full-time equated classified positions 102.0
Flint settlement payment $ 35,000,000
Local finance--FTEs 18.0 2,633,600
Michigan infrastructure council--FTEs 3.0 1,539,000
Property tax assessor training--FTE 1.0 802,900
Supervision of the general property tax law--
FTEs 80.0 17,043,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 57,019,300
Appropriated from:
IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 256,600
Special revenue funds:
Local - assessor training fees 802,900
Local - audit charges 631,600
Local - equalization study chargeback 40,000
Local - revenue from local government 100,000
Delinquent tax collection revenue 1,699,800
Land reutilization fund 2,075,500
Municipal finance fees 608,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 50,804,800
(4) TAX PROGRAMS
Full-time equated classified positions 735.0
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Bottle act implementation $ 250,000
Home heating assistance 3,139,700
Insurance provider assessment program--FTEs 8.0 2,253,900
Living donor tax credit 750,000
Office of revenue and tax analysis--FTEs 25.0 4,433,600
Tax administration services--FTEs 351.0 45,689,800
Tax and economic policy--FTEs 74.0 13,851,000
Tax compliance--FTEs 266.0 41,424,200
Tobacco tax enforcement--FTEs 11.0 1,656,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 113,448,800
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 2,947,900
IDG from MDOT, state aeronautics fund 72,200
Federal revenues:
HHS-SSA, low-income energy assistance 3,139,700
Special revenue funds:
Bottle deposit fund 250,000
Brownfield redevelopment fund 214,200
Comprehensive road funding fund 500,000
Delinquent tax collection revenue 77,925,200
Insurance provider fund 2,253,900
Marihuana regulation fund 2,704,300
Marihuana regulatory fund 119,300
Michigan state waterways fund 107,100
Qualified heavy equipment rental personal
property exemption reimbursement fund 425,500
Tobacco tax revenue 4,301,700
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


State general fund/general purpose $ 18,487,800
(5) FINANCIAL PROGRAMS
Full-time equated classified positions 134.0
Investments--FTEs 81.0 $ 23,031,900
Savings, access, and financial empowerment--
FTEs 34.0 20,518,100
State and authority finance--FTEs 19.0 4,816,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 48,366,100
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG, fiscal agent service fees 215,600
Federal revenues:
DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 3,451,200
DED-OPSE, higher education act of 1995 insured
loans 17,066,900
Special revenue funds:
Defined contribution administrative fee revenue 300,000
Michigan finance authority bond and loan
program revenue 2,862,300
Retirement funds 17,832,200
School bond fees 954,100
Treasury fees 5,131,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 552,800
(6) DEBT SERVICE
Clean Michigan initiative $ 7,098,000
Great Lakes water quality bond 89,761,000
Quality of life bond 620,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 97,479,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 97,479,000
(7) GRANTS
Convention facility development distribution $ 128,730,700
Election administrative support fund 20,255,500
Emergency 911 payments 49,147,300
Health and safety fund grants 1,220,900
Qualified heavy equipment rental personal
property exemption reimbursement distribution 27,000,000
Recreational marihuana grants 94,300,000
Senior citizen cooperative housing tax
exemption program 12,525,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 333,179,800
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Convention facility development fund 128,730,700
Emergency 911 fund 49,147,300
Health and safety fund 1,220,900
Marihuana regulation fund 94,300,000
Qualified heavy equipment rental personal
property exemption reimbursement fund 27,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 32,780,900
(8) BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY
Full-time equated classified positions 210.0
Lottery information technology services and
projects $ 3,886,200
Lottery operations--FTEs 210.0 38,734,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 42,620,500
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
State lottery fund 42,620,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(9) MICHIGAN GAMING CONTROL BOARD
Full-time equated classified positions 227.0
Casino gaming control operations--FTEs 201.0 $ 44,067,300
Gaming information technology services and
projects 6,015,900
Horse racing--FTEs 6.0 2,169,700
Michigan gaming control board 113,500
Millionaire party regulation--FTEs 20.0 3,302,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 55,668,500
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Casino gambling agreements 1,035,800
Equine development fund 2,290,500
Fantasy contest fund 1,101,100
Internet gaming fund 17,529,200
Internet sports betting fund 3,130,500
State services fee fund 30,581,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(10) PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES
Commercial forest reserve $ 3,603,900
Purchased lands 14,201,700
Swamp and tax reverted lands 23,977,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,783,400
Appropriated from:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Special revenue funds:
Private funds 44,300
Game and fish protection account 4,812,400
Michigan natural resources trust fund 3,618,700
Michigan state waterways fund 417,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 32,890,300
(11) REVENUE SHARING
City, village, and township revenue sharing $ 333,547,300
Constitutional state general revenue sharing
grants 1,045,337,700
County revenue sharing 291,111,400
Financially distressed cities, villages, or
townships 2,500,000
Public safety revenue sharing grants 50,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,722,496,400
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Revenue sharing trust fund 624,658,700
Sales tax 1,097,837,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(12) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY
Full-time equated classified positions 4.0
State building authority--FTEs 4.0 $ 1,034,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,034,800
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
State building authority revenue 1,034,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(13) CITY INCOME TAX ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
Full-time equated classified positions 76.0
City income tax administration program--FTEs 76.0 $ 12,214,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,214,800
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Local - city income tax fund 12,214,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(14) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Treasury operations information technology
services and projects $ 47,170,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 47,170,600
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDOT, Michigan transportation fund 834,400
Federal revenues:
DED-OPSE, federal lenders allowance 590,200
Special revenue funds:
Local - city income tax fund 2,274,500
Delinquent tax collection revenue 18,495,600
Marihuana regulation fund 778,200
Retirement funds 829,700
Tobacco tax revenue 134,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 23,233,800
(15) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Election equipment reserve fund $ 43,164,000
Gaming control information technology services
and projects 2,500,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Local prosecutor support grants 20,047,000
Local prosecutor support adjustment grants 5,339,900
Municipal infrastructure grant program 8,000,000
Public safety academy assistance grant program 5,000,000
Wrongful imprisonment compensation fund 10,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 94,050,900
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Internet gaming fund 2,125,000
Internet sports betting fund 125,000
State services fee fund 250,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 91,550,900

PART 1A
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026
Sec. 151. There is appropriated for the executive and
legislature to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2026, from the following funds:
Sec. 152. EXECUTIVE OFFICE
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 0
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 0
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,000,000
(2) EXECUTIVE OFFICE OPERATIONS
Executive office 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,000,000
Sec. 153. LEGISLATURE
(1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (2,000,000)
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (2,000,000)
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 0
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 0
State general fund/general purpose $ (2,000,000)
(2) LEGISLATURE
Senate $ (2,000,000)
House of representatives (2,000,000)
Senate $ 1,000,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


House of representatives 1,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (2,000,000)
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ (2,000,000)

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. (1) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of
the state constitution of 1963 for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$3,923,879,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is
$2,212,171,400.00. The following itemized statement identifies
appropriations from which spending to local units of government
will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
Election administration and services $ 10,000,000
Fees to local units 500
Motorcycle safety education grants 1,415,900
Subtotal $ 11,416,400
DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET
Capital city services $ 1,000,000
Subtotal $ 1,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY
Airport parking distribution pursuant to section
909 $ 46,000,000
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


City, village, and township revenue sharing 333,547,300
Commercial forest reserve 3,603,900
Constitutional state general revenue sharing
grants 1,045,337,700
Convention facility development fund
distribution 128,730,700
County revenue sharing 291,111,400
Election equipment reserve fund 43,164,000
Emergency 9-1-1 payments 49,147,300
Financially distressed cities, villages, or
townships 2,500,000
Health and safety fund grants 1,220,900
Local prosecutor support grants 20,047,000
Local prosecutor support adjustment grants 5,339,900
Municipal infrastructure grant program 8,000,000
Public safety revenue sharing grants 50,000,000
Purchased lands 14,201,700
Qualified heavy equipment rental personal
property exemption reimbursement 27,000,000
Recreational marihuana grants 94,300,000
Senior citizen cooperative housing tax exemption 12,525,400
Swamp and tax reverted lands 23,977,800
Subtotal $ 2,199,755,000
TOTAL $ 2,212,171,400
(2) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state
constitution of 1963, in the appropriations acts for the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending from state
sources is estimated at $50,204,395,300.00 and total state spending
from state sources to be paid to local units of government is
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


estimated at $27,222,946,200.00. The proportion of total state
spending from state sources to be paid to local units is estimated
at 54.22%.
(3) If payments to local units of government and state
spending from state sources for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are different than the amounts estimated in subsection
(2), the state budget director shall report the payments to local
units of government and state spending from state sources that were
made for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 to the standard
report recipients and to the senate and house of representatives
standing committees on appropriations not later than 30 days after
the final book-closing for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2027.
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "AFSCME" means American Federation of State, County, and
Municipal Employees.
(b) "COBRA" means the consolidated omnibus budget
reconciliation act of 1985, Public Law 99-272.
(c) "DAG" means the United States Department of Agriculture.
(d) "DED" means the United States Department of Education.
(e) "DED-OPSE" means the DED Office of Postsecondary
Education.
(f) "EEOC" means the United States Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission.
(g) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(h) "Geographically disadvantaged business enterprise" means a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


geographically-disadvantaged business enterprise as that term is
defined by Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
(i) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(j) "HHS-OS" means the HHS Office of the Secretary.
(k) "HHS-SSA" means the Social Security Administration.
(l) "HUD" means the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.
(m) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(n) "JCOS" means the joint capital outlay subcommittee.
(o) "Legislatively directed spending item" means that term as
defined in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA
431, MCL 18.1364.
(p) "MCL" means the Michigan Compiled Laws.
(q) "MDE" means the Michigan department of education.
(r) "MDHHS" means the Michigan department of health and human
services.
(s) "MDIFS" means the Michigan department of insurance and
financial services.
(t) "MDLARA" means the Michigan department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.
(u) "MDLEO" means the Michigan department of labor and
economic opportunity.
(v) "MDMVA" means the Michigan department of military and
veterans affairs.
(w) "MDOC" means the Michigan department of corrections.
(x) "MDOS" means the Michigan department of state.
(y) "MDOT" means the Michigan department of transportation.
(z) "MDSP" means the Michigan department of state police.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(aa) "MDTMB" means the Michigan department of technology,
management, and budget.
(bb) "MEDC" means the Michigan economic development
corporation, which is the public body corporate created under
section 28 of article VII of the state constitution of 1963 and the
urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to
124.512, by contractual interlocal agreement effective April 5,
1999, between local participating economic development corporations
formed under the economic development corporations act, 1974 PA
338, MCL 125.1601 to 125.1636, and the Michigan strategic fund.
(cc) "MEGA" means the Michigan economic growth authority.
(dd) "MFA" means the Michigan finance authority.
(ee) "MPE" means the Michigan public employees.
(ff) "MPSCS" means the Michigan public safety communications
system.
(gg) "MSF" means the Michigan strategic fund.
(hh) "NERE" means nonexclusively represented employees.
(ii) "PA" means public act.
(jj) "RFP" means a request for a proposal.
(kk) "SEIU" means Service Employees International Union.
(ll) "SIGMA" means statewide integrated governmental management
applications.
(mm) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on general government, the senate and
house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the
state budget office.
(nn) "WIC" means women, infants, and children.
(oo) "UAW" means the United Automobile, Aerospace, and
Agricultural implement Workers of America.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part, make each report
readily accessible to the public, and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports posted on the website from previous fiscal years, listed by
fiscal year, in the same archivable location. The department or
agency shall transmit all required reports for the current fiscal
year to the standard recipients and any other required recipients
by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. A department or agency shall not take disciplinary
action against an employee of a department or an agency within a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


department for communicating with a member of the legislature or
legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law
and the department or agency is exercising its authority as
provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out‐of‐
state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department or agency shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the house and senate
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of
the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In accordance with section 352 of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, which provides for a
transfer of state general fund revenue into or out of the
countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund, the
calculations required by section 352 of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, are determined as follows:
2025 2026 2027
Michigan personal income (millions) $672,972 $695,180 $720,207
Less: transfer payments 151,408 157,704 158,089
Subtotal $521,564 $537,476 $562,118
Divided by: Detroit Consumer Price
Index for 12 months ending December 31 2.979 3.078 3.17
Equals: real adjusted Michigan
personal income $175,089 $174,604 $177,311
Percentage change N/A -0.3% 1.6%
Growth rate in excess of 2% N/A 0.0% 0.0%
Equals: calculated transfer to
countercyclical budget and
economic stabilization fund
for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027 (millions) N/A $0.0
Growth rate less than 0% N/A YES
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Appropriation from countercyclical budget N/A NO
and economic stabilization fund allowed for
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), there is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 from general fund/general
purpose revenue for deposit into the countercyclical budget and
economic stabilization fund the sum of $0.00.
Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
MDTMB to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at
no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following
for each department or agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, a department or agency receiving
appropriations in part 1 shall cooperate with the state budget
office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted
fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state
restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The
report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


services or supplies, or both. Each director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department or agency contracts to
subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises for services, supplies, or both.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, a department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 and the office of the auditor
general shall report on the number of FTEs in pay status by type of
staff and civil service classification, including comparison by
line item of the number of FTEs authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of FTE positions employed by the
department or agency or the office of the auditor general at the
end of the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the
senate and house appropriations committees and to the standard
report recipients.
Sec. 216. (1) A department or agency shall maximize
utilization of its in-person state workforce. A department or
agency shall prioritize occupancy utilization of office space for
each division within the department or agency. Employees with job
responsibilities that require the employees to serve in their
capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period
to ensure all work hours reported on the timesheet were actually
worked.
(2) A department or agency shall comply with requirements set
forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and
utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-
person work is optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher,
subject to market conditions.
(3) A department or agency shall adhere to civil service rules
and regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. A department or agency shall
establish policies and processes to ensure all employees are
working their jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 217. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, each department or agency and
the legislature shall submit an annual report that summarizes all
work project accounts. The report must include all of the
following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 218. A department or agency receiving appropriations in
part 1 shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from
appropriations in part 1. A department or agency shall follow
federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term
retention of records. A department or agency may electronically
retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and
state guidelines.
Sec. 219. Not later than April 1, a department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on each specific
policy change made to implement a PA affecting the department or
agency that took effect during the previous calendar year. The
report must include reference to the public act that necessitates
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


the policy change. The department or agency shall submit the report
to the standard report recipients, to the senate and house
appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 221. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, a department or agency shall
not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing
authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are
exhausted.
Sec. 223. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 shall provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department or agency,
including reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue
reductions, the annual report must detail the impact on the
department or agency and residents of this state, including, but
not limited to, all of the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services that the department or agency will have to
reduce or eliminate as a result of the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


that is regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 224. Not later than April 1, a department or agency shall
provide to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual
strategic plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must
include the mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance
measures of the department.
Sec. 226. A department or agency shall report on any court
settlement that may require further legislative review of state
statutory programs or regulations.
Sec. 227. Not later than November 15, a department or agency
shall disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other
third-party funds received by the department or agency in the
previous fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding
received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for
which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds.
The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and
to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations
committees.
Sec. 228. (1) Not later than 30 days after the effective date
of this act, the house and senate shall provide to the state budget
office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively directed
spending items funded in part 1. The list must include all
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


information and documents pertaining to the legislatively directed
spending items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections
364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering a legislatively directed spending item shall post a
report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning
March 15. The department or agency shall update the report and
shall post an updated report not later than June 15 and again not
later than September 15. The department or agency shall include in
the report the most comprehensive information for each
legislatively directed spending item that the department has
available at the time of posting.
Sec. 229. The state budget director shall ensure that all
state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the
American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by
December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal recovery
funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026, are
automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial closeout period.
Sec. 230. (1) The state budget director shall ensure that all
state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the
American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by
December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget director
may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
All funds reallocated are unappropriated under this subsection and
are immediately reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making a reallocation under subsection (1). The notification must
include the authorized program under which funds were originally
appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the program, or
programs, or purpose, and the department or agency to which the
funds are being reallocated, and the amount reallocated to each
program or purpose.
Sec. 231. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if a department or agency is authorized under this part to
expend funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the
department shall do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department or agency in the previous fiscal
year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receiving the funds
authorized under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of
the house and senate appropriations committees, the house and
senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that details
all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
or agency anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year
that details all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 232. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by
this state or a department, agency, or authority of this state to
purchase an ownership interest in a casino enterprise or a gambling
operation as those terms are defined in the Michigan Gaming Control
and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226.

DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL
Sec. 301. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $750,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 302. (1) The attorney general shall perform all legal
services, including representation before courts and administrative
agencies, rendering legal opinions, and providing legal advice to a
principal executive department or state agency. A principal
executive department or state agency shall not employ or enter into
a contract with any other person for services described in this
section.
(2) The attorney general shall defend judges of all state
courts if a claim is made or a civil action is commenced for
injuries to persons or property caused by the judge through the
performance of the judge's duties while acting within the scope of
the judge's authority as a judge.
(3) The attorney general shall perform the duties specified in
1846 RS 12, MCL 14.28 to 14.35, and 1919 PA 232, MCL 14.101 to
14.102, and as otherwise provided by law.
Sec. 303. The attorney general may provide not more than 350
copies of the report required under section 30 of 1846 RS 12, MCL
14.30, on a gratis basis. If the attorney general provides 350
copies of the report on a gratis basis, the attorney general may
sell additional copies of the report. The attorney general shall
not provide gratis copies of the report to members of the
legislature. Electronic copies of biennial reports must be made
available on the department of attorney general's website. The
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


attorney general shall sell copies of the report at not less than
the actual cost of the report and deposit the money received from
the sales into the general fund.
Sec. 304. The department of attorney general is responsible
for the legal representation of the law of this state and the legal
representation for state of Michigan state employee worker's
disability compensation cases. The risk management revolving fund
revenue appropriation in part 1 must be satisfied by billings from
the department of attorney general for the actual costs of legal
representation, including salaries and support costs.
Sec. 307. (1) In addition to the antitrust enforcement
collections revenues in part 1, not more than $5,000,000.00 in
antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, consumer protection
or class action enforcement revenues, or attorney fees recovered by
the department of attorney general are appropriated to the
department of attorney general for antitrust, securities fraud, and
consumer protection or class action enforcement cases.
(2) Not more than $1,000,000.00 of the unexpended funds from
antitrust revenues, securities fraud revenues, or consumer
protection or class action enforcement revenues at the end of the
fiscal year, including antitrust funds in part 1, may be carried
forward for expenditure in the following fiscal year.
(3) On request, the department of attorney general shall make
available information detailing the amount of revenue described in
subsection (1) recovered by the attorney general and a description
of the source of the revenue and the carryforward amount.
Sec. 308. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
not more than $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from litigation expense
reimbursements awarded to this state.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(2) The funds described in subsection (1) may be expended for
the payment of court judgments, settlements, arbitration awards or
other administrative and litigation decisions, attorney fees, and
litigation costs, assessed against the office of the governor, the
department of attorney general, the governor, or the attorney
general when acting in an official capacity as the named party in
litigation against this state. The funds described in subsection
(1) may also be expended for the payment of state costs incurred
under section 16 of chapter X of the code of criminal procedure,
1927 PA 175, MCL 770.16.
(3) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year may be
carried forward for expenditure in the following year, but not more
than a maximum authorization of $250,000.00.
Sec. 309. (1) From the prisoner reimbursement funds
appropriated in part 1, the department of attorney general may
expend not more than $790,600.00 on activities related to the state
correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA 253, MCL 800.401
to 800.406. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, if the
department of attorney general collects more than $1,131,000.00 in
gross annual prisoner reimbursement receipts provided to the
general fund, not more than $1,000,000.00 of the excess is
appropriated to the department of attorney general and may be spent
on the representation of the MDOC and its officers, employees, and
agents, including, but not limited to, the defense of litigation in
civil actions filed by prisoners against this state, its
departments, officers, employees, or agents.
(2) Not later than March 1, the department of attorney general
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
house of representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


with jurisdiction over the budget of the MDOC. The report must
include all of the following:
(a) The total amount of reimbursements received under section
6 of the state correctional facility reimbursement act, 1935 PA
253, MCL 800.406.
(b) A description of each expenditure made from the
reimbursements.
(c) The amount paid to conduct the investigations from the
reimbursements.
(d) The amount credited to the general fund from the
reimbursements.
Sec. 310. (1) For the purposes of providing title IV-D child
support enforcement funding, the attorney general shall maintain a
cooperative agreement with the MDHHS, as the state IV-D agency, for
federal IV-D funding to support the child support enforcement
activities within the department of attorney general.
(2) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee
shall, to the extent allowed under federal law, have access to any
information used by this state to locate parents who fail to pay
court-ordered child support.
Sec. 312. The department of attorney general shall not receive
or expend funds, other than those authorized in part 1, for legal
services provided specifically to other state departments or
agencies except for expert witness costs, court costs, or other
nonsalary litigation costs associated with a pending legal action.
Sec. 313. The department of attorney general shall submit a
quarterly report on the lawsuit settlement proceeds fund described
in section 33 of 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.33, to the standard report
recipients. Each report must include all of the following:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(a) The total amount of revenue deposited in the lawsuit
settlement proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by
case.
(b) The total amount appropriated from the lawsuit settlement
proceeds fund in the current fiscal year delineated by
appropriation.
(c) Earned settlement proceeds that are anticipated but not
yet deposited in the fund delineated by case.
(d) Any known potential settlement amounts from cases that
have not been decided, delineated by case.
Sec. 315. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are $10,220,500.00. From this amount, total department of
attorney general appropriations for pension-related legacy costs
are estimated at $10,220,500.00. Total department of attorney
general appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are
estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 316. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for sexual
assault law enforcement efforts, the department of attorney general
shall use the funds to test backlogged sexual assault kits across
this state. The funding provided in part 1 must be used for only 1
or more of the following purposes:
(a) To eliminate all county sexual assault kit backlogs across
this state.
(b) To assist local prosecutors with investigations and
prosecutions of viable sexual assault cases.
(c) To provide victim services.
(2) Not later than February 1, the department of attorney
general shall submit a report to the standard report recipients.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


The report must include all of the following information:
(a) The number of sexual assault kits across this state that
remain untested as of January 31, 2027.
(b) A detailed work plan that outlines the department of
attorney general's action plan to eliminate all outstanding sexual
assault kits and the time frame for completion of testing of all
untested sexual assault kits.
(c) A detailed work and spending plan that outlines
anticipated litigation action and expenditures resulting from
findings of the sexual assault kit testing.
(3) Any funds remaining after the department of attorney
general has met the obligations required under subsection (1) may
be used for the purpose of retesting any previously tested sexual
assault kits across this state using currently available DNA
testing. Funds may be used under this subsection only for DNA
testing on previously tested kits that were not tested for DNA. If
there are remaining untested sexual assault kits on January 31,
2027, funds appropriated in part 1 must be used only for the
testing of those kits.
Sec. 319. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the attorney
general shall submit a quarterly report on the wrongful
imprisonment compensation fund that includes at least all of the
following:
(a) All payments made from the wrongful imprisonment
compensation fund in each prior quarter of the fiscal year, and the
total of those payments, including if each payment is part of a new
settlement or part of an installment plan.
(b) Total payments made from each prior fiscal year and the
total of all payments to date.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(c) Any settlements that have been decided but have yet to
receive a payment.
(d) The number of known cases seeking a settlement, but do not
have a final judgment, and the dollar amount of each potential
payment for these known cases, and the total of these payments.
(e) The balance of the wrongful imprisonment compensation fund
at the end of the previous quarter.
(f) The percentage of claims received in the immediately
preceding fiscal quarter that were awarded compensation.
(g) The percentage of claims received in the immediately
preceding fiscal year that were awarded compensation.
(h) For claims that did not receive the full amount of
compensation sought, both of the following:
(i) The amount of compensation that was sought.
(ii) The amount of compensation that was received.
Sec. 320. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of attorney general shall do all of the following:
(a) Not later than 14 days after the settlement of a lawsuit
with a fiscal impact of $200,000.00 or more, submit a report on the
settlement to the standard report recipients.
(b) Enforce the laws of this state.
(2) Any proceeds from a lawsuit initiated by or settlement
agreement entered into on behalf of this state against a
manufacturer of tobacco products or manufacturer or distributor of
opioid products by the attorney general are state funds, unless
otherwise directed by a court or legal agreement, and are subject
to appropriation as provided by law.
Sec. 321. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of attorney general shall maintain a publicly accessible
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


website dedicated to opioid settlement distributions. The website
must include estimated future amounts payable to local units of
government and estimated amounts received by local units of
government, delineated by case settlement agreement.
Sec. 322. (1) Not later than February 1, the department of
attorney general shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on the cumulative dollar expenditure amount related to
each of the following initiatives and activities of the department
of attorney general for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) Elder abuse task force.
(b) Conviction integrity unit.
(c) Opioid litigation.
(d) Hate crimes unit and domestic terrorism unit.
(e) Payroll fraud enforcement unit.
(f) PFAS contamination. As used in this subdivision, "PFAS"
means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
(g) Human trafficking.
(h) Robocall enforcement.
(i) Job court.
(j) Organized retail crime unit.
(k) Reducing utility rate increases.
(l) Address confidentiality program.
(2) For each expenditure required to be reported under
subsection (1), the report must include the dollar amount spent by
fund source.
(3) For each initiative listed under subsection (1), the
department of attorney general shall provide a summary of
activities, staffing levels, and outcomes as practicable.
Sec. 324. (1) Not later than September 30, the department of
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


attorney general must make available to the public on its website a
report on the activities and findings, since April 1, 2019, of the
payroll fraud enforcement unit. The report must include all of the
following:
(a) A list of each complaint received by the unit.
(b) For each complaint listed under subdivision (a), whether
the attorney general took enforcement action on the complaint and,
if applicable, a description of the enforcement action.
(2) If the payroll fraud enforcement unit requests that
another department or agency investigate the validity of a report
received by the unit, or if the unit refers a complaint to another
department or agency, the department of attorney general shall
request the department or agency to report back on the department's
or agency's findings to enable the department of attorney general
to comply with this section.
Sec. 325. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1,
$2,450,000.00, of which $1,950,000.00 is a one-time appropriation,
must be used by a nonprofit entity or nonprofit entities to provide
legal and technical assistance to low-income individuals and to
pursue impact litigation that protects low-income and marginalized
populations.
(2) For the purposes of facilitating and administering this
program, the department of attorney general may contract with a
third-party nonprofit entity or foundation involved in promoting
improvements in the administration of justice.
(3) A third-party nonprofit entity or foundation contracted to
administer and facilitate this program shall subgrant all or part
of the distribution from part 1. The subgrant must be used to
provide legal and technical assistance to low-income individuals
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


and to pursue impact litigation that protects low-income and
marginalized populations. A grant or subgrant for purposes of this
section must not go to an entity receiving federal funding for the
purposes of providing legal aid. Not more than 10% of the money
appropriated in part 1 may be used for administering this grant
program.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 330. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
utility rate case oversight are designated as a work project
appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support legal activities
conducted by the department of attorney general pertaining to
utility rate cases.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.

DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS
Sec. 401. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $375,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 402. (1) In addition to the appropriations contained in
part 1, the department of civil rights may receive and expend not
more than $600,000.00 in funds from local sources, private sources,
or both, for all of the following purposes:
(a) Developing and presenting training for employers on equal
employment opportunity law and procedures.
(b) Publishing and selling civil rights related informational
material.
(c) Providing copies of material made available in response to
requests under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL
15.231 to 15.246.
(d) Paying other copy fees, subpoena fees, and witness fees.
(e) Developing, presenting, and participating in mediation
processes for certain civil rights cases.
(f) Providing workshops, seminars, and recognition or award
programs consistent with the programmatic mission of the individual
unit sponsoring or coordinating the programs.
(g) Paying staffing costs for all activities included in this
subsection.
(2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives standing committees on
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for
purposes authorized under this section.
Sec. 403. (1) The department of civil rights may contract with
local units of government to review equal employment opportunity
compliance of potential and existing contractors and may charge for
and expend amounts received from local units of government for the
purpose of developing and providing these contractual services.
(2) Not later than November 30, the department of civil rights
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives standing committees on
appropriations on the amount of funds received and expended for
purposes authorized under this section.
Sec. 404. The department of civil rights shall submit
quarterly reports to the standard report recipients that include,
but are not limited to, all of the following information for the
immediately preceding fiscal quarter:
(a) The number of all complaints received by the department by
basis of complaint.
(b) The number of certified complaint cases initiated by basis
of complaint.
(c) The number of certified complaint cases completed.
(d) The final disposition of certified complaint case
investigations.
(e) The average number of days for a case to be completed
after certification.
(f) The number of FTE positions filled from the FTE
authorization for complaint investigations and enforcement.
(g) The number of open cases that have been open for more than
1 year.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(h) The quotient of the number of certified cases completed
divided by the number of filled FTE positions.
(i) A listing of amounts awarded to claimants.
Sec. 405. On submitting a report or complaint to the United
States Commission on Civil Rights or any other federal department,
the department of civil rights shall submit a copy of the report or
complaint to the standard report recipients not later than the next
business day.
Sec. 410. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are $2,255,000.00. From this amount, total department of
civil rights appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $2,255,000.00. Total department of civil rights
appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated
at $0.00.

LEGISLATURE
Sec. 600. The senate, the house of representatives, or an
entity within the legislative branch may receive, expend, and
transfer funds in addition to those authorized in part 1.
Sec. 601. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 to an entity within
the legislative branch must not be expended or transferred to
another account without written approval of the authorized agent of
the legislative entity. If the authorized agent of the legislative
entity notifies the state budget director of its approval of an
expenditure or transfer before the year-end book-closing date for
that legislative entity, the state budget director shall
immediately make the expenditure or transfer. The authorized
legislative entity must be designated by the speaker of the house
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


of representatives for house entities, the senate majority leader
for senate entities, and the legislative council for legislative
council entities.
(2) Funds appropriated within the legislative branch, to a
legislative council component, must not be expended by any agency
or other subgroup included in that component without the approval
of the legislative council.
Sec. 602. The senate may charge rent and assess charges for
utility costs. The amounts received for rent charges and utility
assessments are appropriated to the senate for the renovation,
operation, and maintenance of the Binsfeld Office Building.
Sec. 604. (1) The appropriation in part 1 to the Michigan
state capitol historic site includes funds to operate the
legislative parking facilities in the capitol area. The Michigan
state capitol commission shall establish rules regarding the
operation of the legislative parking facilities.
(2) The Michigan state capitol commission may collect a fee
from state employees and the general public using certain
legislative parking facilities. The revenues received from the
parking fees are appropriated on receipt and must be allocated by
the Michigan state capitol commission.
(3) As used in this section, "Michigan state capitol
commission" means the Michigan state capitol commission established
in the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL
4.1945.
Sec. 605. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the
legislative council are designated as a work project appropriation,
and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end
of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


projects under this section until the projects have been completed.
The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is publication of the Michigan
manual.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 606. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
property management are designated as a work project appropriation,
and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end
of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for
projects under this section until the projects have been completed.
The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to purchase equipment and
services for building maintenance to ensure a safe and productive
work environment.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 607. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
automated data processing are designated as a work project
appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to purchase equipment,
software, and services to support and implement data processing
requirements and technology improvements.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 608. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the
Michigan capitol committee publications save the flags fund account
may accept contributions, gifts, bequests, devises, grants, and
donations. Those funds that are not expended in the fiscal year
ending September 30, 2027 do not lapse at the close of the fiscal
year, and must be carried forward for expenditure in the following
fiscal years.
Sec. 611. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
senate, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship program.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for house of
representatives, $250,000.00 must be allocated for an internship
program.
Sec. 612. It is the intent of the legislature that, from the
funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan state capitol commission
established in section 5 of the Michigan state capitol historic
site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945, ensure that the Capitol Building
is open for not less than 3 hours on Saturdays that are not state
holidays.
Sec. 615. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $15,046,800.00. From this amount, total
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


legislature appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $15,046,800.00. Total legislature appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.

LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR GENERAL
Sec. 620. In accordance with section 53 of article IV of the
state constitution of 1963, the auditor general shall conduct
audits of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches.
Sec. 621. (1) The auditor general shall take all reasonable
steps to ensure that certified minority- and women-owned and
operated accounting firms, accounting firms owned and operated by
persons with disabilities, and accounting firms that are
geographically disadvantaged business enterprises participate in
the audits of the books, accounts, and financial affairs of each
principal executive department, branch, institution, agency, and
office of this state.
(2) If the auditor general contracts with a firm to perform
audits of the principal executive departments and state agencies,
the auditor general shall strongly encourage the firm to
subcontract with certified minority- and women-owned and operated
accounting firms, accounting firms owned and operated by persons
with disabilities, and accounting firms that are geographically
disadvantaged business enterprises.
(3) Not later than November 1, the auditor general shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients regarding the
number of contracts entered into with certified minority- and
women-owned and operated accounting firms, accounting firms owned
and operated by persons with disabilities, and accounting firms
that are geographically disadvantaged business enterprises.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 622. From the funds appropriated in part 1 to the office
of the auditor general, the auditor general's salary and the
salaries of the remaining 2.0 FTE unclassified positions must be
set by the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate
majority leader, the house of representatives minority leader, and
the senate minority leader.
Sec. 623. Any audits, reviews, or investigations requested of
the auditor general by the legislature or by legislative
leadership, legislative committees, or individual legislators must
include an estimate of the additional costs involved and, if those
costs exceed $50,000.00, must provide supplemental funding. The
auditor general shall determine whether to perform those activities
in accordance with Operations Manual Policy No. 2-26.
Sec. 627. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
field operations are designated as a work project appropriation,
and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end
of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for
projects under this section until the projects have been completed.
The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to conduct the state of
Michigan annual comprehensive financial report.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees and contract audits.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 628. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons
of the senate and house appropriations committees, and the senate
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


and house oversight committees that includes all of the following
information related to projects initiated during the immediately
preceding quarter:
(a) Audit title.
(b) Audit type.
(c) Audit period.
(d) Audit objectives.
(e) Branch of government being audited.
(f) Whether the auditor general or a contracted auditor is
conducting the audit and, if a contracted auditor is conducting the
audit, the identity of the contracted auditor.
(g) Details regarding the reason for initiating the audit,
including whether it was discretionary or required by statute.
(h) Details regarding any similar audit the auditor general
has completed in the past.
(i) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit.
(j) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to
complete the audit and release a report.
Sec. 629. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons
of the senate and house appropriations committees, and the senate
and house oversight committees that includes all of the following
information for each project in progress during the immediately
preceding quarter:
(a) Audit title.
(b) Date the audit was initiated.
(c) Audit status.
(d) Estimated time frame for completion of the audit.
(e) Details regarding the resources spent on the audit to
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


date.
(f) Estimated total auditor general resources necessary to
complete the audit and release a report.
Sec. 630. On a quarterly basis, the auditor general shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients, the chairpersons
of the senate and house appropriations committees, and the senate
and house oversight committees that contains all of the following
information for each project completed during the immediately
preceding quarter:
(a) Audit title.
(b) Date the audit was initiated.
(c) Date the audit report was released.
(d) Results of the audit, including the number and type of
findings.
(e) Details regarding total auditor general resources spent on
the audit.
(f) To the extent authorized by law, details regarding any
inquiry, tip, or request related to the audit that the auditor
general received before initiating the audit.

DEPARTMENT OF STATE
Sec. 701. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for state
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS
shall submit quarterly reports on record lookup fees to the
standard report recipients. Each report must include the number of
records sold and the revenues collected as authorized in section
208b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.208b,
section 7 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.297, and sections 80130, 80315,
81114, and 82156 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80130, 324.80315, 324.81114,
and 324.82156.
Sec. 705. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations,
contributions, and grants of money and other property from any
private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the
cost of a departmental publication that is prepared and
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL
257.1 to 257.923. A private or public funding source may receive
written recognition in the publication and may furnish a traffic
safety message, subject to approval of the MDOS, for inclusion in
the publication. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation,
contribution, or grant. The MDOS may furnish copies of a
publication underwritten, in whole or in part, by a private source
to the underwriter at no charge.
(2) The MDOS may sell and accept paid advertising for
placement in a departmental publication that is prepared and
disseminated under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL
257.1 to 257.923. The MDOS may charge and receive a fee for any
advertisement appearing in a departmental publication and shall
review and approve the content of each advertisement. The MDOS may
refuse to accept advertising from any person or organization. The
MDOS may furnish a reasonable number of copies of a publication to
an advertiser at no charge.
(3) Pending expenditure, the funds received under this section
must be deposited in the Michigan department of state publications
fund created in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA
300, MCL 257.211. Funds given, donated, or contributed to the MDOS
from a private source are appropriated and allocated for the
purpose for which the revenue is furnished. Funds granted to the
MDOS from a public source are allocated and may be expended on
receipt by the MDOS. The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation,
contribution, or grant if receipt is conditioned on a commitment of
state funding at a future date. Revenue received from the sale of
advertising is appropriated and may be expended on receipt by the
MDOS.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(4) Any unexpended revenues received under this section must
be carried over into subsequent fiscal years and are available for
appropriation for the purposes described in this section.
(5) If the MDOS receives a gift, contribution, donation, or
grant of money as authorized under section 705 of article 5 of 2025
PA 22, not later than March 1, the MDOS shall submit a report to
the standard report recipients that includes all of the following
information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) The amount of gifts, contributions, donations, and grants
of money received by the MDOS under section 705 of article 5 of
2025 PA 22.
(b) A list of the expenditures made from the amounts received
by the MDOS as reported in subdivision (a).
(c) A list of any gift, donation, contribution, or grant of
property other than funding received by the MDOS under section 705
of article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
(d) The total revenue received from the sale of paid
advertising accepted under this section and a statement of the
total number of advertising transactions.
(6) In addition to copies delivered without charge as the
secretary of state considers necessary, the MDOS may sell copies of
manuals and other publications regarding the sale, ownership, or
operation or regulation of motor vehicles, with amendments, at
prices to be established by the secretary of state. As used in this
subsection, the term "manuals and other publications" includes
videos and proprietary electronic publications. All funds received
from sales of these manuals and other publications must be credited
to the Michigan department of state publications fund created in
section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 707. Funds collected by the MDOS under section 211 of the
Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211, are appropriated
for all expenses necessary to provide for the costs of the
publication described in section 211 of the Michigan vehicle code,
1949 PA 300, MCL 257.211. Funds are allocated for expenditure when
they are received by the department of treasury and do not lapse to
the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.
Sec. 708. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS
shall use available balances at the end of the state fiscal year to
provide payment to the MDSP in the amount of $332,000.00 for the
services provided by the traffic accident records program as first
appropriated in 1990 PA 196 and 1990 PA 208.
Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDOS may
restrict funds from miscellaneous revenue to cover cash shortages
created from normal branch office operations. The restricted amount
must not exceed $50,000.00 of the total funds available in
miscellaneous revenue.
Sec. 710. The MDOS shall delegate all responsibility for the
procurement, development, and maintenance of all information
technology services and products to the MDTMB unless otherwise
delegated the responsibility by law in an effort to streamline the
procurement process and to ensure compliance with the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.
Sec. 711. Collector plate and fund-raising registration plate
revenues collected by the MDOS are appropriated and allotted for
distribution to the recipient university or public or private
agency overseeing a state-sponsored goal when received.
Distributions must occur on a quarterly basis or as otherwise
authorized by law. Any revenues remaining at the end of the fiscal
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


year do not lapse to the general fund and remain available for
distribution to the university or agency in the next fiscal year.
Sec. 713. (1) The MDOS, in collaboration with the Gift of Life
Michigan or its successor federally designated organ procurement
organization, may develop and administer a public information
campaign concerning the Michigan organ donor program.
(2) The MDOS may solicit funds from any private or public
source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the public information
campaign authorized by this section. The MDOS may accept gifts,
donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property
from private and public sources for this purpose. A private or
public funding source underwriting the public information campaign,
in whole or in substantial part, shall receive sponsorship credit
for its financial backing.
(3) Funds received under this section, including grants from
state and federal agencies, do not lapse to the general fund at the
end of the fiscal year and remain available for expenditure for the
purposes described in this section.
(4) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program
must be used to produce a pamphlet regarding organ donations and to
distribute the pamphlet with driver licenses and personal
identification cards. The pamphlet must do both of the following:
(a) Explain the organ donor program and encourage people to
become donors by marking a checkoff on driver license and personal
identification card applications.
(b) Include a return reply form addressed to the gift of life
organization.
(5) Funding appropriated in part 1 for the organ donor program
must be used to pay for return postage costs of the return reply
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


form described in subsection (4)(b).
(6) In addition to the appropriations in part 1, the MDOS may
receive and expend funds from the organ and tissue donation
education fund for administrative expenses.
(7) Not later than March 1, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients. The report must include
all of the following:
(a) The amount of revenue collected by the MDOS under this
section.
(b) The purpose of each expenditure.
(c) The amount of revenue carried forward.
Sec. 714. (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection
(2), not less than 180 days before closing a branch office or
consolidating a branch office and not less than 60 days before
relocating a branch office, the MDOS shall submit a report to the
standard report recipients, the members of the senate and house of
representatives standing committees on appropriations, and
legislators who represent affected areas. The report must include
all of the following:
(a) All analyses done regarding criteria for changes in the
location of branch offices, including, but not limited to, all of
the following:
(i) Branch transactions.
(ii) Revenue.
(iii) The impact on citizens of the affected area, including
information regarding additional distance to branch office
locations resulting from the changes.
(b) Detailed estimates of costs and savings that will result
from the overall changes made to the branch office structure.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(c) Detailed estimates of costs for new leased facilities and
expansions of current leased space.
(2) If the consolidation of a branch office is with another
branch office that is located within the same local unit of
government or the relocation of a branch office is to another
location that is located within the same local unit of government,
the MDOS is not required to submit a report under subsection (1).
(3) As used in this section, "local unit of government" means
a city, village, township, or county.
Sec. 715. (1) Any service assessment collected by the MDOS
from the user of a credit or debit card under section 3 of 1995 PA
144, MCL 11.23, may be used by the MDOS for necessary expenses
related to that service and may be remitted to a credit or debit
card company, bank, or other financial institution.
(2) The service assessment imposed by the MDOS for credit and
debit card services may be based on a percentage of each individual
credit or debit card transaction or a flat rate per transaction, or
both, scaled to the amount of the transaction. However, the
department shall not charge any amount for a service assessment
that exceeds the costs billable to the MDOS for the service
assessment.
(3) If there is a balance of service assessments received from
credit and debit card services remaining on September 30, the
balance may be carried forward to the following fiscal year and
appropriated for the same purpose.
(4) As used in this section, "service assessment" means costs
associated with service fees imposed by credit and debit card
companies and processing fees imposed by banks and other financial
institutions.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 716. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for branch
operations, the department of state shall provide adequate in-
person services as defined in section 1a of the Michigan vehicle
code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1a.
Sec. 717. (1) The MDOS may accept gifts, donations, or
contributions of property from any private or public source to
support, in whole or in part, the operation of a departmental
function relating to licensing, regulation, or safety. The MDOS may
recognize a private or public contributor for making the
contribution. The MDOS may reject a gift, donation, or
contribution. Any revenues received under this subsection may be
expended for the departmental functions relating to licensing,
regulation, or safety.
(2) The MDOS shall not accept a gift, donation, or
contribution under subsection (1) if receipt of the gift, donation,
or contribution is conditioned on a commitment of future state
funding.
(3) If the MDOS receives a gift, donation, or contribution of
property as authorized under this section, not later than March 1,
the MDOS shall submit a report to the standard report recipients.
The report must include a list of each gift, donation, or
contribution received by the department under subsection (1) for
the immediately preceding calendar year.
Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for election
regulation, all money must be spent in accordance with the Michigan
election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992, and the
instructions, orders, and guidance of the secretary of state
regarding the proper method for the conduct and administration of
elections.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


Sec. 719. Not later than February 1, the MDOS shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients on all funding allocated
to counties, cities, and townships from funds appropriated in part
1 for election administration and services. The report must include
the amount and purpose of each payment provided to a county, city,
or township.
Sec. 721. (1) Upon the conclusion of any security service
provided to a legislator outside of the state capitol complex, the
sergeant at arms shall submit a formal incident service report with
the secretary of state. This report must include all of the
following:
(a) The date, time, and specific location of the service.
(b) The name of the legislator receiving protection.
(c) A description of the security necessity or specific threat
addressed.
(d) A detailed account of any coordination with local or state
law enforcement agencies.
(e) A listing of any significant security incidents or use-of-
force incidents occurring during the detail.
(2) A report described in subsection (1) must not include
information that would compromise the safety or security of a
legislator, including security plans, emergency operations, or
other sensitive details.
(3) Not fewer than 1 time each legislative session, the
sergeant at arms, or the designee of the sergeants at arms, shall
submit a written report to the house and senate committees on
government operations that details all security services provided
to legislators. While maintaining the confidentiality of sensitive
security protocols, the report must include all of the following:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(a) The total number of security details deployed.
(b) The general nature of threats addressed.
(c) A summary of operational expenditures.
(4) As soon as practicable, but not later than 5 business days
after the secretary of state receives a report submitted under
subsections (1) or (3), the secretary of state shall make the
report, or all of the contents of the report, available without
charge to the public on a separate webpage or the MDOS webpage.
(5) A legislator that violates this section shall reimburse
the legislative chamber of which the legislator is a member for any
expenses incurred by the chamber in the course of the violation and
shall additionally pay a penalty of not less than 10% of that
amount. The reimbursement and penalty must not be paid from funds
obtained from state sources or from funds that are subject to the
Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.201 to 169.282.
Sec. 724. The MDOS shall reimburse a county, city, or township
for allowable expenses not later than 60 days after the MDOS
receives a bill for allowable expenses and all necessary
documentation from the county, city, or township.
Sec. 725. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $14,617,600.00. From this amount, total
department of state appropriations for pension-related legacy costs
are estimated at $14,617,600.00. Total department of state
appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated
at $0.00.

DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET
Sec. 801. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 802. Any proceeds that exceed necessary costs incurred in
conducting transfers, auctions, direct sales, or scrapping of state
surplus property under section 267 of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1267, are appropriated to the MDTMB to
offset any costs incurred in the acquisition and distribution of
surplus property. The MDTMB shall provide consolidated internet
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


auction services through this state's contractors for all local
units of government.
Sec. 803. (1) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in
addition to those authorized by part 1 for maintenance and
operation services provided specifically to other principal
executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch,
the judicial branch, or private tenants, or provided in connection
with facilities transferred to the operational jurisdiction of the
MDTMB.
(2) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to
those authorized by part 1 for real estate, architectural, design,
engineering, and project oversight services provided specifically
to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the
legislative branch, the judicial branch, universities, community
colleges, or private tenants.
(3) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to
those authorized in part 1 for mail pickup and delivery services
provided specifically to other principal executive departments and
state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch.
(4) The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in addition to
those authorized in part 1 for purchasing services provided
specifically to other principal executive departments and state
agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch.
(5) Any revenue collected by the MDTMB from user fees under
subsections (1) to (4) must be carried forward and does not lapse
to the general fund at the close of the fiscal year.
Sec. 805. To the extent a specific appropriation is required
for a detailed source of financing included in part 1 for the MDTMB
appropriations financed from special revenue and internal service
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


and pension trust funds, or SIGMA user charges, the specific
amounts are appropriated within the special revenue internal
service and pension trust funds in portions not to exceed the
aggregate amount appropriated in part 1.
Sec. 807. Funding in part 1 for SIGMA must be funded by
proportionate charges assessed against the respective state funds
benefiting from the SIGMA project in the amounts determined by
MDTMB.
Sec. 808. (1) A deposit against the IDG from building
occupancy and parking charges appropriated in part 1 must be
collected, in part, from state agencies, the legislative branch,
and the judicial branch based on estimated costs associated with
maintenance and operation of buildings managed by MDTMB. To the
extent excess revenue is collected due to estimates of building
occupancy charges exceeding actual costs, the excess revenue may be
carried forward into subsequent fiscal years for the purpose of
returning funds to state agencies.
(2) An appropriation in part 1 for building occupancy and
parking charges may be increased to return excess revenue collected
to state agencies.
Sec. 809. On a biannual basis, the MDTMB shall submit a report
to the standard report recipients on any revisions either
individually or in the aggregate that increase or decrease current
contracts by more than $250,000.00 for computer software
development, hardware acquisition, or quality assurance.
Sec. 810. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB
shall maintain an internet website that contains notice of all
solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests for proposals
over $50,000.00 that are issued by the MDTMB or by any state agency
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


operating under delegated authority, except for solicitations up to
$500,000.00 in accordance with the MDTMB policy regarding providing
opportunities to Michigan small businesses, geographically
disadvantaged business enterprises, Michigan veteran-owned
business, Michigan service disabled veteran-owned businesses, or
Michigan recognized community rehabilitation organizations, or if
the MDTMB determines and documents that it is in the best interest
of this state. This information must appear on the first page of
each department or state agency dashboard.
(2) The MDTMB shall set the due date for acceptance of an
invitation for bid or request for proposal to not less than 14 days
after the notice is made available on the internet website
described in subsection (1), unless the MDTMB determines and
documents that a different due date is in the best interest of this
state.
(3) In addition to the requirements of this section, the MDTMB
may advertise the solicitations, invitations for bids, and requests
for proposals in any manner that the MDTMB determines is
appropriate to give the greatest number of persons the opportunity
to respond or make bids or requests for proposals.
(4) A new request for a proposal that is publicly displayed on
the internet website must include the proposal's corresponding
department or agency. The internet website must allow for the
searching of requests for proposals by department or agency.
Sec. 811. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MDTMB
shall maintain a system that interfaces with other departments and
agencies to track the performance of vendors in fulfilling contract
obligations. The performance of these vendors must be recorded and
used as a factor to determine future contracts awarded in the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


procurement process.
Sec. 812. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $42,113,600.00. From this amount, total
MDTMB appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are estimated
at $42,113,600.00. Total MDTMB appropriations for retiree health
care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 813. (1) Funds in part 1 for motor vehicle fleet are
appropriated to the MDTMB for administration and the acquisition,
lease, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, and disposal of
state motor vehicles.
(2) The funds described in subsection (1) must be funded by
revenue from rates charged to principal executive departments and
agencies for utilizing vehicle travel services provided by the
MDTMB. Any revenue in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1
from the motor transport fund and any unencumbered funds are
restricted revenues and may be carried over into the succeeding
fiscal year.
(3) The MDTMB shall, not later than 90 days after the close of
the fiscal year, submit an annual report to the standard report
recipients regarding the operation of the motor vehicle fleet. The
report must include all of the following:
(a) The number of vehicles assigned to, or authorized for use
by, state departments and agencies.
(b) The number of vehicles in the motor vehicle fleet.
(c) The number of miles driven by fleet vehicles.
(d) The number of gallons of fuel consumed by fleet vehicles.
(e) A description of fleet garage operations.
(f) The goods sold and services provided by the fleet garage.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(g) The number of employees assigned to each fleet garage.
(4) The information provided under subsection (3) may be
adjusted during the fiscal year based on needs and cost savings to
achieve the maximum value and efficiency from the state motor
fleet.
(5) The MDTMB may charge state agencies for fuel cost
increases that exceed 10% of the budgeted price per gallon of motor
vehicle fuels. The MDTMB shall notify state agencies, in writing or
by email, not less than 30 days before implementing additional
charges for fuel cost increases. Any revenue received from these
charges is appropriated on receipt.
(6) The state budget director, on notification to the senate
and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations,
may adjust spending authorization and the IDG from motor transport
fund in the MDTMB to ensure that the appropriations for motor
vehicle fleet in the MDTMB budget equal the expenditures for motor
vehicle fleet in the budgets for all executive branch agencies.
Sec. 814. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for motor
vehicle fleet, the MDTMB shall prioritize vehicle options that
minimize the total cost of ownership over the expected service life
of the vehicle when obtaining, leasing, or replacing state motor
vehicles. Criteria for assessing these options shall include, but
not be limited to, cost projections for all of the following:
(a) Vehicle acquisition costs.
(b) Fuel costs.
(c) Energy use and associated costs.
(d) Maintenance and repair costs.
(e) Operational reliability.
(f) Resale or disposal value.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(2) To the extent practicable and consistent with operational
needs, the MDTMB shall give preference to vehicle technologies that
demonstrate lower long-term operating and maintenance costs and
that reduce exposure to fuel price volatility.
Sec. 815. By November 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to
the standard report recipients on expenditures of funds
appropriated in 2021 PA 87 for legal services funding and carried
forward under work project account number 17458, titled "legal
services". The report must itemize expenditures by case, purpose,
and department involved and must include expenditures related to
all previously appropriated funds including those expended in
fiscal year 2025-2026.
Sec. 816. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the office of
the state employer shall work with all state departments and
agencies to set requirements on in-person work and utilization of
state buildings to ensure in-person work completed by state of
Michigan nonfield employees is optimized and the occupancy rate of
state-owned or occupied buildings, subject to market conditions, is
80% or higher.
Sec. 820. The MDTMB shall post on its website and make
available to the public a list of all parcels of real property
owned by this state that are available for purchase.
Sec. 821. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
office of retirement services within the MDTMB shall prepare a
report by September 30 on the judges' retirement system, the
military retirement system, the Michigan public school employees'
retirement system, the state employees' retirement system, and the
state police retirement system. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


(2) The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the
following information for each of the retirement systems described
in subsection (1):
(a) A chart and table that details annual required
contribution flow per year for fiscal year 2024-2025 and the
subsequent 24 fiscal years.
(b) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and
tables for pension and other postemployment benefits.
(c) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and
tables for the current annualized rate of return, an annualized
rate of return 50 basis points less than the current annualized
rate of return, and an annualized rate of return 100 basis points
less than the current annualized rate of return.
(d) Separate annual required contribution payment charts and
tables by normal cost and unfunded actuarial accrued liability.
(e) A justification if the payroll growth assumption is
maintained at or above 0% for any pension or OPEB plan. The report
must include an analysis of active employee plan member forecasts.
(3) The report must include the following items specific to
the Michigan public school employees' retirement system:
(a) A copy of the retirement plan election guide that is
provided to new Michigan public school employees' retirement system
hires as of the due date of the report.
(b) The number of new Michigan public school employees'
retirement system employees who entered the defined contribution
plan and pension plus II plan not later than 14 days after the end
of the current fiscal year.
(c) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide
explains that pension plus II members must pay 50% of any future
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


unfunded actuarial accrued liability payments.
(d) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide
explains that defined contribution plan members have annuity
options that allow for guaranteed retirement income available
through a private insurance company.
(e) If any calculations are provided to plan members for
expected retirement income, then the following items must be
included:
(i) An explanation of how the retirement plan election guide
demonstrates a range of potential outcomes.
(ii) The underlying assumptions the retirement plan election
guide uses to calculate expected future retirement income.
(iii) How underlying assumptions are disclosed in the guide.
(4) The report must include the amount of money that each
school district received, on a per pupil basis, in foundation
allowances that was spent on Michigan public school employees'
retirement system costs in the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(5) The office of retirement services must post the most
recent year's comprehensive annual financial report for each plan
described in subsection (1) not later than 90 days after the end of
the fiscal year.
Sec. 822. Not later than January 1, the MDTMB shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients related to the salaries of
unclassified employees and gubernatorial appointees within all
state departments and agencies. The report must enumerate each
unclassified employee and gubernatorial appointee and the
employee's or appointee's annual salary rounded to the nearest
thousand dollars.
Sec. 822c. The funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


to support any staff effort, projects, consultant expenses, or any
other activity related to the development, financing, construction,
operation, or implementation of the Gordie Howe International
Crossing or any successor project unless the approval of the
project is enacted into law.
Sec. 822d. Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit
a report to the standard report recipients that includes all of the
following:
(a) The fee and rate schedules to be used by state departments
and agencies for services, including information technology,
provided by the MDTMB during the current fiscal year.
(b) The changes from fees and rates charged in the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
(c) An explanation of the factors that justify each fee and
rate increase described in subdivision (b).
Sec. 822e. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part
1, the funds collected by the MDTMB for supplying census-related
information and technical services, publications, statistical
studies, population projections and estimates, and other
demographic products are appropriated for all expenses necessary to
provide the required services. These funds are available for
expenditure when they are received and may be carried forward into
the next fiscal year.
(2) Not later than March 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report to
the standard report recipients that provides the amount of revenue
collected by the MDTMB from the authorization in subsection (1) and
the amount of revenue carried forward.
Sec. 822f. Not later than 30 business days after the budget
director notifies each member of the senate and house
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


appropriations committees and fiscal agencies of work projects that
the director has ordered to lapse for work projects W1101024,
W1609023, W6660022, W666023, W6695022, and TW5090022 in accordance
with section 451a(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431
MCL 18.1451a, $17,336,900 in general funds shall be appropriated to
budget and financial management or statewide integrated government
management application, as determined by the state budget director,
in addition to the funds appropriated in part 1.
Sec. 822g. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for business
support services, not more than an additional $200,000.00 may be
used to continue a comprehensive supplier risk and information
subscription used for the precontract risk assessment program.
Sec. 822h. (1) From the funds in part 1 for capital city
services, the MDTMB shall provide reimbursements to the city of
Lansing to provide support for local infrastructure and municipal
services, including, but not limited to, maintenance or improvement
of local roads, sidewalks, public utility infrastructure, emergency
response, traffic management, or other public safety services that
support the state capitol and adjacent state facilities.
(2) The MDTMB shall reimburse the city described in subsection
(1) quarterly for eligible expenses if the city of Lansing provides
supporting documentation related to the eligible expenses to the
MDTMB and the eligible expenses are approved for reimbursement.
(3) The city of Lansing shall maintain and provide any
supporting documentation that is requested for auditing purposes.
Sec. 822j. (1) The make it in Michigan competitiveness fund is
created within the state treasury.
(2) Funds may be spent from the make it in Michigan
competitiveness fund only on appropriation or administrative
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


transfer pursuant to subsection (3).
(3) A transfer of funds from federal or state restricted
contingency funds into make it in Michigan may be made by the state
budget director not less than 30 days after notifying each member
of the senate and house appropriations committees. Those transfers
may be disapproved by either appropriations committee within the 30
days and, if disapproved within that time, are not effective.
(4) A transfer approved under this section constitutes
authorization to transfer the amount recommended and approved.
However, the amount must be reduced by the state budget director to
be within the current unobligated amount of the appropriation.
(5) Transfers must not be authorized under any of the
following circumstances:
(a) To create a new line-item appropriation or to create a new
state program.
(b) To or from an operating appropriation line item that did
not appear in the fiscal year appropriation bills for which the
transfer is being made.
(c) To or from a work project as designated under section 451a
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a.
(d) Between state governmental funds.
(6) Interest and earnings from the investment of funds
deposited in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund must be
deposited in the general fund.
(7) Funds in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund at
the close of a fiscal year remain in the make it in Michigan
competitiveness fund and do not lapse to the general fund.
(8) Funds appropriated or transferred from the make it in
Michigan competitiveness fund are available to leverage federal
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


funding opportunities that include, but are not limited to,
infrastructure, health, public safety, mobility and
electrification, climate and the environment, economic development,
or other funding opportunities administered by the federal
government. Funding opportunities may be in the form of formula or
competitive-based grants, cooperative agreements, or contracts, and
may include funds contained in the infrastructure investment and
jobs act, Public Law 117-58, the CHIPS act of 2022, division A of
Public Law 117-167, the inflation reduction act of 2022, Public Law
117-169, or any other federal acts.
(9) The Michigan infrastructure office, in collaboration with
the state budget director, shall form an interagency evaluation
committee that includes the department of environment, Great Lakes,
and energy, the MDLEO, the MDOT, the MSF, or other entities at the
discretion of the Michigan infrastructure office, to develop
program guidelines and selection criteria for the recommended
appropriation or transfer of funds. The interagency evaluation
committee shall make recommendations to the director of the MDTMB
and the state budget director on the disbursement of funds. Funding
must also be used to cover all costs related to the administration
of this section.
(10) The MDTMB shall inform the legislature not later than 30
days after any federal funds are received that would be used as the
basis for recommended appropriations or transfers from the make it
in Michigan competitiveness fund.
(11) Not later than 90 days after the close of each fiscal
year, the MDTMB shall report to the legislature on the projects
funded with make it in Michigan competitiveness fund money.

BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


MEMORIALS
Sec. 822k. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds from the
Vietnam veterans memorial monument fund in accordance with the
Michigan Vietnam veterans memorial act, 1988 PA 234, MCL 35.1051 to
35.1057. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by
the MDTMB and may be expended on receipt.
Sec. 822l. The Michigan veterans' memorial park commission may
receive and expend money from any source, public or private,
including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations of money,
and government appropriations, for the purposes described in
Executive Order No. 2001-10. The funds are appropriated and
allocated when received by the Michigan veterans' memorial park
commission and may be expended on receipt. Any deposit made under
this section and any unencumbered funds are restricted revenues and
may be carried over into subsequent fiscal years.
Sec. 822m. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
the MDTMB may receive and expend money from the Michigan law
enforcement officers memorial monument fund in accordance with the
Michigan law enforcement officers memorial act, 2004 PA 177, MCL
28.781 to 28.786. Any deposit made into the fund is restricted
revenues and must be carried over into succeeding fiscal years.

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Sec. 824. The MDTMB may enter into agreements to provide
spatial information and technical services to other principal
executive departments, state agencies, local units of government,
and other organizations. The MDTMB may receive and expend funds in
addition to those authorized in part 1 for providing information
and technical services, publications, maps, and other products. The
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


MDTMB may expend amounts received for salaries, supplies, and
equipment necessary to provide informational products and technical
services.
Sec. 825. (1) The legislature shall have access to all
historical and current data contained within SIGMA, or its
predecessor, pertaining to state departments.
(2) State departments shall have access to all historical and
current data contained within SIGMA or its predecessor.
Sec. 827. (1) The MDTMB shall assess all subscribers of the
Michigan public safety communications system reasonable access and
maintenance fees and deposit the fees in the Michigan public safety
communications systems fees fund.
(2) All money received by the MDTMB under this section must be
expended for the support and maintenance of the Michigan public
safety communications system.
(3) Any deposits made under this section and unencumbered
funds are restricted revenues and must be carried forward into
succeeding fiscal years.
(4) The MDTMB shall prepare a report that indicates the amount
of revenue collected under this section and expended for support
and maintenance of the Michigan public safety communication system
for the immediately preceding 6-month period. The report must be
submitted to the standard report recipients not later than April
15.
Sec. 828. Not later than 45 days after the end of the current
fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that includes both of the following:
(a) The estimated total amount of funding appropriated for
information technology services and projects, by funding source,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


for all principal executive departments and agencies for the
immediately preceding fiscal year.
(b) A listing of the expenditures made from the amounts
received by the MDTMB as reported in subdivision (a).
Sec. 829. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide
integrated government management application must be used to
maintain all existing financial reporting attributes and features
of the statewide integrated government management application,
including, but not limited to, the business intelligence reporting
platform. All agency, department, and individual reports produced
or executed within business intelligence as a part of the statewide
integrated government management application as of September 30,
2026 must remain available and accessible to users.
(2) A notification of planned changes to the vendor or data
structure of reports within the business intelligence reporting
platform must be provided by the state budget office electronically
to all statewide integrated government management application users
not later than 60 business days before the implementation of any
modifications. The notification must include the following:
(a) A brief description of the planned changes.
(b) A description of how the planned changes would improve
accuracy, functionality, or user experience.
Sec. 830. (1) Any revenue collected from licenses issued under
the antenna site management project shall be deposited in the
antenna site management revolving fund created for this purpose in
the MDTMB. The MDTMB may receive and expend money from the fund for
costs associated with the antenna site management project,
including the cost of a third-party site manager. Any excess
revenue remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


be proportionately transferred to the appropriate state restricted
funds as designated in a PA or the state constitution of 1963.
(2) An antenna must not be placed on any site under this
section without complying with the respective local zoning codes
and local unit of government processes.
Sec. 831. If the MDTMB provides information technology
services to a department or agency directly, the MDTMB shall submit
a monthly invoice to the department or agency for the information
technology services provided. If the MDTMB provides information
technology services to a department or agency through a contracted
vendor, the MDTMB shall submit an invoice to the department or
agency not later than 60 days after the MDTMB receives approval to
pay the vendor invoice.
Sec. 832. (1) The MDTMB shall inform the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on general government and the senate
and house fiscal agencies not later than 30 days after learning of
the proposal of a potential penalty proposed or the assessment of
an actual penalty assessed by the federal government for failure of
the Michigan child support enforcement system to achieve
certification by the federal government.
(2) If a potential penalty is proposed by the federal
government, the MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients not later than 90 days after the date the potential
penalty is proposed specifying the MDTMB's plans to avoid the
assessment of an actual penalty and ensure federal certification of
the Michigan child support enforcement system.
Sec. 833. (1) The state budget director, on notification to
the standard report recipients and the senate and house of
representatives standing committees on appropriations, may adjust
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk


spending authorization and user fees in the MDTMB to ensure that
the appropriations for information technology in the MDTMB equal
the appropriations for information technology in the budgets for
all executive branch agencies.
(2) If, during the fiscal year, a supplemental appropriation
or transfer is made under section 393(2) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393, to or from an information
technology line item in an agency budget, there is appropriated an
equal amount of user fees in the MDTMB to accommodate an increase
or decrease in spending authorization.
Sec. 835. The MDTMB shall provide a report to the standard
report recipients on all new contracts for software development
services that have a value greater than $10,000,000.00 or that are
effective for a period longer than 3 years. The report must be
submitted not later than January 15 and must cover the immediately
preceding 12 months.
Sec. 837. All information technology projects funded by
appropriations in part 1 must do both of the following:
(a) Use information technology project management best
practices and services as defined or recommended by the enterprise
portfolio management office of the MDTMB.
(b) Comply with the requirements of the state unified
information technology environment methodology as it applies to all
information technology project management processes.

STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY RENT
Sec. 842. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state building
authority rent may, in addition to this purpose, be expended for
the payment of required premiums for insurance on facilities owned
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

100
by the state building authority or payment of costs that may be
incurred as the result of any deductible provisions in the
applicable insurance policies.
(2) If the amount appropriated in part 1 for state building
authority rent is not sufficient to pay the rent obligations and
insurance premiums and deductibles identified in subsection (1) for
state building authority projects, there is appropriated from the
general fund of this state the amount necessary to pay the
obligations.

OFFICE OF THE STATE EMPLOYER
Sec. 843. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide
appropriations must be funded by assessments against longevity and
insurance appropriations throughout state government in a manner
prescribed by the MDTMB. The funds must be used as specified in
joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated
compensation hearings process. Any deposits of assessments made
under this subsection and any unencumbered funds are restricted
revenues, may be carried over into the succeeding fiscal years, and
are appropriated.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 for
statewide appropriations, the MDTMB may receive and expend funds in
the additional amounts specified in joint labor/management
agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings
process, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as
prescribed in subsection (1).
Sec. 844. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
MDTMB may receive and expend funds from other principal executive
departments and state agencies to implement administrative leave
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

101
bank transfer provisions specified in joint labor/management
agreements. The funds may also be transferred to other principal
executive departments and state agencies under the joint
labor/management agreement and any amounts transferred under the
joint labor/management agreement are authorized for receipt and
expenditure by the receiving principal executive department or
state agency. Any funds received by the MDTMB under this section
and intended, under the joint labor/management agreements, to be
available for use beyond the close of the fiscal year, and any
unencumbered funds, may be carried over into the next fiscal year.

CIVIL SERVICE COMMISSION
Sec. 850. (1) In accordance with section 5 of article XI of
the state constitution of 1963, all restricted funds must be
assessed a sum not less than 1% of the total aggregate payroll paid
from those funds for financing the civil service commission on the
basis of actual 1% restricted sources total aggregate payroll of
the classified service for the preceding fiscal year. This
includes, but is not limited to, restricted funds appropriated in
part 1 of any appropriations act. The civil service commission
shall return any unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection to each 1% fund source not later than 6 months after the
end of the fiscal year.
(2) The appropriations in part 1 are estimates of actual
charges based on payroll appropriations. With the approval of the
state budget director, the civil service commission may adjust
financing sources for civil service charges based on actual payroll
expenditures, if the adjustments do not increase the total
appropriation for the civil service commission.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

102
(3) The financing from restricted sources must be credited to
the civil service commission by the end of the second fiscal
quarter.
Sec. 851. Except where specifically appropriated for this
purpose, financing from restricted sources must be credited to the
civil service commission. For restricted sources of funding within
the general fund that have the legislative authority for carryover,
if current spending authorization or revenues are insufficient to
accept the charge, the shortage must be taken from carryforward
balances of that funding source. Restricted revenue sources that do
not have carryforward authority must be utilized to satisfy civil
service commission operating deductions first and civil service
commission obligations second. General fund dollars are
appropriated for any shortfall, if approved by the state budget
director.
Sec. 852. The appropriation in part 1 to the civil service
commission, for state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending
accounts, and COBRA, represents amounts, in part, included within
the various appropriations throughout state government for the
current fiscal year to fund the flexible spending account program
included within the civil service commission. Deposits against
state-sponsored group insurance, flexible spending accounts, and
COBRA for the flexible spending account program must be made from
assessments levied during the fiscal year in a manner prescribed by
the civil service commission. Unspent employee contributions to the
flexible spending accounts may be used to offset administrative
costs for the flexible spending account program, and any remaining
balance of unspent employee contributions lapses to the general
fund.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

103

CAPITAL OUTLAY
Sec. 860. As used in sections 861 through 875 of this part:
(a) "Board" means the state administrative board created in
section 1 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.1.
(b) "Community college" means a community college organized
under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to
389.195, or under part 25 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451,
MCL 380.1601 to 380.1607, and does not include a state agency or
university.
(c) "Director" means the director of the MDTMB.
(d) "State agency" means an agency of state government. State
agency does not include a community college or university.
(e) "State building authority" means the authority created in
section 2 of 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.412.
(f) "University" means a 4-year university supported by this
state. University does not include a community college or a state
agency.
Sec. 861. Each capital outlay project authorized in this part
and part 1 or any previous capital outlay act shall comply with the
procedures required by the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.
Sec. 862. (1) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients and the JCOS on the status of each planning or
construction project financed by the state building authority, this
part and part 1, or a previous PA.
(2) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit
a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS for each
capital outlay project other than lump sums that includes all of
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

104
the following:
(a) The account number and name of each construction project.
(b) The balance remaining in each account.
(c) The date of the last expenditure from the account.
(d) The anticipated date of occupancy if the project is under
construction.
(e) The appropriations history for the project.
(f) The professional service contractor.
(g) The amount of the project financed with federal funds.
(h) The amount of the project financed through the state
building authority.
(i) The total authorized cost for the project and the state
authorized share if different than the total.
(3) Before the end of the fiscal year, the MDTMB shall submit
a report to the standard report recipients and the JCOS on all of
the following for each project by a state agency, university, or
community college that is authorized for planning but is not yet
authorized for construction:
(a) The name of the project and account number.
(b) Whether a program statement is approved.
(c) Whether schematics are approved by the MDTMB.
(d) Whether preliminary plans are approved by the MDTMB.
(e) The name of the professional service contractor.
(4) As used in this section, "project" includes appropriation
line items made for purchase of real estate.
Sec. 863. The MDTMB shall work with all state departments and
agencies to evaluate their current office building and space usage
to identify any projected changes for the current and next fiscal
year. The MDTMB shall report the following information to the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

105
standard report recipients not later than May 1:
(a) Projected changes in state-owned property being utilized
by each department and agency for the current and next fiscal year.
(b) Projected changes to leased property being utilized by
each department and agency for the current and next fiscal year.
(c) A comparative analysis of 2022 occupancy levels to
expected levels for the current and next fiscal year.
(d) All of the following information for the immediately
preceding fiscal year:
(i) A list of expenditures related to space optimization as a
result of remote work, including costs associated with divesting
state-owned property and vacating leased facilities.
(ii) Net savings as a result of property divestment or vacated
leased facilities.
(iii) A description of each divested property or location of
each vacated leased facility.
Sec. 864. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay must
be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year in accordance with
section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1248.
Sec. 865. (1) A site preparation economic development fund is
created in the MDTMB. The MEDC board and the state budget director
shall determine whether a specific state-owned site qualifies for
inclusion in the site preparation economic development fund.
(2) Any proceeds from the sale of an economic development site
must be deposited in the site preparation economic development fund
and are available for site preparation expenditures, unless
otherwise provided by law. The economic development sites are
authorized for sale consistent with state law. Expenditures from
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

106
the site preparation economic development fund are authorized for
site preparation activities that enhance the marketable sale value
of the economic development sites.
(3) A cash advance in an amount of not more than
$25,000,000.00 is authorized from the general fund to the site
preparation economic development fund.
(4) Not later than December 31, the MDTMB shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house
of representatives standing committees on appropriations that
includes both of the following:
(a) The revenue and expenditure activity in the site
preparation economic development fund for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
(b) The sites identified as economic development sites.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Economic development site" means a state-owned site that
is declared as surplus property under section 251 of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1251, and would provide
economic benefit to the area of the site or to this state.
(b) "Site preparation activities" includes, but is not limited
to, demolition, environmental studies and abatement, utility
enhancement, and site excavation.
Sec. 866. (1) The energy efficiency revolving fund is created
within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or
other assets from any source for deposit into the energy efficiency
revolving fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of
the energy efficiency revolving fund. The state treasurer shall
credit to the energy efficiency revolving fund interest and
earnings from energy efficiency revolving fund investments.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

107
(2) Money in the energy efficiency revolving fund at the close
of the fiscal year remains in the energy efficiency revolving fund
and does not lapse to the general fund.
(3) The MDTMB shall provide oversight and direction for the
energy efficiency revolving fund, coordinate a call for projects,
and prioritize the award of projects that will contribute to a
reduction in this state's carbon footprint. State administrative
costs must be not more than 10% of the total project cost.
(4) The MDTMB shall set terms with agencies participating in
the energy efficiency revolving fund program that include the scope
of each project, funding commitments, data collection and reporting
requirements, and any other financial terms related to realization
of energy savings related to implementation of the project. The
MDTMB may enter into a memorandum of understanding to memorialize
these terms.
(5) Not later than February 1, the MDTMB shall submit a report
to the standard report recipients on projects funded under this
section in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report must
list each approved project, the amount provided from the energy
efficiency revolving fund for each project, the department or
agency under which the project belongs, anticipated annual savings
from each project, and revenue from savings deposited into the
energy efficiency revolving fund by project.
Sec. 867. In addition to the appropriations for special
maintenance, remodeling, and additions for state agencies in part
1, there is appropriated related federal and state restricted funds
up to the amounts that will be earned based upon the initiatives
undertaken with the funds in part 1. The state budget director
shall determine and authorize the appropriate manner for
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

108
implementing this section.

CAPITAL OUTLAY - UNIVERSITIES AND COMMUNITY COLLEGES
Sec. 873. (1) This section applies only to projects for
community colleges.
(2) State support is directed towards the remodeling and
additions, special maintenance, or construction of certain
community college buildings. The community college shall obtain or
provide for site acquisition and initial main utility installation
to operate the facility. The funding must be composed of local and
state shares and not more than 50% of a capital outlay project, not
including a lump-sum special maintenance project or remodeling and
addition project, for a community college may be appropriated from
state and federal funds, unless otherwise appropriated by the
legislature.
(3) An expenditure under this part and part 1 is authorized
when the release of the appropriation is approved by the board on
the recommendation of the director. The director may recommend to
the board the release of any appropriation in part 1 only after the
director is assured that the legal entity operating the community
college to which the appropriation is made has complied with this
part and part 1 and has matched the amounts appropriated as
required by this part and part 1. A release of funds in part 1 must
not exceed 50% of the total cost of planning and construction of
any project, not including lump-sum remodeling and additions and
special maintenance, unless otherwise appropriated by the
legislature. Further planning and construction of a project
authorized by this part and part 1 or applicable sections of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

109
must be in accordance with the purpose and scope as defined and
delineated in the approved program statements and planning
documents. This part and part 1 are applicable to all projects for
which planning appropriations were made in previous PAs.
(4) The community college shall take the steps necessary to
secure available federal construction and equipment money for
projects funded for construction in this part and part 1 if an
application was not previously made. If there is a reasonable
expectation that a previous year unfunded application may receive
federal money in a subsequent year, the community college shall
take whatever action necessary to keep the application active.
Sec. 874. If university and community college matching
revenues are received in an amount less than the appropriations for
capital projects contained in this part and part 1, the state funds
must be reduced in proportion to the amount of matching revenue
received.
Sec. 875. (1) The director may require that community colleges
and universities that have an authorized project described in part
1 submit documentation regarding the project match and governing
board approval of the authorized project not more than 60 days
after the beginning of the fiscal year.
(2) If the documentation required by the director under
subsection (1) is not submitted, or does not adequately
authenticate the availability of the project match or governing
board approval of the authorized project, the director may
terminate the authorization. The authorization terminates 30 days
after the director notifies the JCOS of the intent to terminate the
project unless the JCOS approves an extension of the authorization.

BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

110
DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY
OPERATIONS
Sec. 901. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $20,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 902. (1) Amounts needed to pay for interest, fees,
principal, mandatory and optional redemptions, arbitrage rebates as
required by federal law, and costs associated with the payment,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

111
registration, trustee services, credit enhancements, and issuing
costs in excess of the amount appropriated to the department of
treasury in part 1 for debt service on notes and bonds that are
issued by this state under sections 14, 15, or 16 of article IX of
the state constitution of 1963, as implemented by 1967 PA 266, MCL
17.451 to 17.455, are appropriated.
(2) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department
of treasury for debt service in part 1, there is appropriated an
amount for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs to pay for
interest on interfund borrowing authorized under 1967 PA 55, MCL
12.51 to 12.53.
(3) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department
of treasury for debt service in part 1, all repayments received by
this state on loans made from the school bond loan fund that the
state treasurer determines are not required to be deposited in the
school loan revolving fund under section 4 of 1961 PA 112, MCL
388.984, are appropriated to the department of treasury for the
payment of debt service, including, but not limited to, optional
and mandatory redemptions, on bonds, notes, or commercial paper
issued by this state under 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.981 to 388.985.
Sec. 902a. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in
part 1, not later than 30 days after a refunding or restructuring
bond issue is sold, the department of treasury must submit a report
to the standard report recipients and the senate and house of
representatives standing committees on appropriations. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A comparison of the annual debt service before the
refinancing or restructuring to the annual debt service after the
refinancing or restructuring.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

112
(b) The change in the principal and interest over the duration
of the debt.
(c) The projected change in the present value of the debt
service as a result of the refinancing and restructuring.
Sec. 902b. As a condition of receiving the appropriations in
part 1, not later than 30 days after the state of Michigan
comprehensive annual financial report under section 494 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1494, is published,
the department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients on all funds that are controlled or administered
by the department of treasury and not appropriated in part 1. The
current and all previous reports prepared as required under this
section must be saved and made available on the department of
treasury's public website and stored in a common location with all
other reports that the department of treasury is required by law to
prepare. The link to the location of the reports must be clearly
indicated on the main page of the department of treasury's internet
website. The report must include all of the following information
for each fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) The starting balance.
(b) Total revenue generated by transfers in and investments.
(c) Total expenditures.
(d) The ending balance.
Sec. 903. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of treasury may contract for services to support
collection of taxes and other accounts due this state or due a city
for which the department of treasury has entered into an agreement
to provide tax administration services. In addition to the amounts
appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

113
appropriated amounts necessary to fund the cost of these
collections, including infrastructure costs. The additional amounts
appropriated under this subsection must not exceed 25% of the
collections or 2.5% plus operating costs, as applicable. Each
contract must prescribe the applicable amount. The amounts
appropriated to fund collection costs and fees under this
subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the
corresponding taxes and other accounts being collected are recorded
or dedicated. However, if the taxes and other accounts collected
are dedicated for a specific purpose under the state constitution
of 1963, the amounts appropriated under this subsection are
appropriated from the general purpose account of the general fund.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of
treasury may contract for services to collect defaulted student
loans and other accounts due the Michigan guaranty agency. In
addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of
treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund
collection costs and fees not to exceed 24.34% of the collection or
a lesser amount as prescribed by the contract. The amounts
appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the fund
or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or
dedicated.
(3) By November 30, the department of treasury shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house
of representatives standing committees on appropriations. The
report must include all of the following information for the
immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) The name of each entity that the department of treasury
contracted with under subsection (1) or (2).
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

114
(b) The amount collected under each contract.
(c) The costs of collection under each contract.
(d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining
whether the authority described in subsection (1) or (2) should be
continued.
Sec. 904. (1) The bureau of investments of the department of
treasury may charge an investment service fee against the
applicable retirement funds. The revenue from the investment
service fees charged under this subsection may be expended for
necessary salaries, wages, contractual services, supplies,
materials, equipment, travel, worker's compensation insurance
premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement
fund and the state employees' retirement fund. If the bureau of
investments of the department of treasury charges a total amount of
investment service fees under this subsection that is greater than
the aggregate amount appropriated in part 1, the bureau of
investments of the department of treasury shall periodically repay
the surplus revenue to the applicable retirement funds. The
department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in
sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 from the
retirement funds to the department of treasury, there is
appropriated from retirement funds an amount sufficient to pay for
the services of money managers, investment advisors, investment
consultants, custodians, or other outside professionals that the
state treasurer considers necessary to prudently manage the
retirement funds' investment portfolios. The state treasurer shall
submit an annual report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives standing committees on
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

115
appropriations regarding the performance of each portfolio
delineated by investment advisor.
(3) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
identifies the service fees assessed against each retirement system
under subsection (1) and the methodology used for assessment.
Sec. 904a. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to
recognize and pay expenditures for financial services provided by
financial institutions or equivalent vendors that perform these
financial services, including the department of treasury, as
provided under section 1 of 1861 PA 111, MCL 21.181.
(2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by
restricting revenues from common cash interest earnings and
investment earnings in an amount sufficient to cover these
expenditures. If the amounts of common cash interest earnings are
insufficient to cover these expenditures, miscellaneous revenues
must be used to fund the remaining balance of these expenditures.
Sec. 905. The municipal finance fee fund is created in the
department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of
treasury shall deposit the fees that the department of treasury
collects under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL
141.2101 to 141.2821, into the municipal finance fee fund. The
money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried
forward for future appropriation.
Sec. 906. (1) The department of treasury shall charge for
audits as allowed under state or federal law or under a contract
between the department of treasury and a local unit of government,
other principal executive department, or state agency. However, the
department of treasury shall not charge more than the actual cost
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

116
for performing the audit. Not later than November 30, the
department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that includes details of the audits performed and audit
charges for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(2) The audit charges fund is created in the department of
treasury as a revolving fund. The department of treasury shall
deposit the contractual charges collected under subsection (1) into
the audit charges fund. The money in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year may be carried forward for future appropriation.
Sec. 907. (1) The department of treasury shall create and
operate a property assessor certification and training program. The
purpose of the program is to offer courses in assessment
administration.
(2) The assessor certification and training fund is created in
the department of treasury as a revolving fund. The department of
treasury shall use the money in the assessor certification and
training fund to create and operate the property assessor
certification and training program described in subsection (1).
(3) Each participant in the program shall pay to the
department of treasury an examination fee not to exceed $50.00 per
examination and a certification fee not to exceed $175.00. In
addition, each participant shall pay a fee to cover the expenses
incurred in offering the program to certified assessing personnel
and other individuals interested in an assessment career
opportunity. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees
collected under this subsection into the property assessor
certification and training program fund.
Sec. 908. The amount appropriated in part 1 for the home
heating assistance program is to cover the costs, including data
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

117
processing, of administering federal home heating credits to
eligible claimants and of administering the supplemental fuel cost
payment program for eligible tax credit and welfare recipients.
Sec. 909. Revenue from the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA
248, MCL 207.371 to 207.383, is appropriated and must be
distributed in accordance with section 7a of the airport parking
tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.377a.
Sec. 910. The disbursement by the department of treasury from
the bottle deposit fund to dealers as required by section 3c(3) of
1976 IL 1, MCL 445.573c, is appropriated.
Sec. 911. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to
recognize and pay refundable tax credits, tax refunds, and interest
as provided by law.
(2) The appropriations under subsection (1) must be funded by
restricting tax revenue in an amount sufficient to cover these
expenditures.
Sec. 912. A plaintiff in a garnishment action involving this
state shall pay to the state treasurer 1 of the following:
(a) A fee of $6.00 at the time a writ of garnishment of
periodic payments is served on the state treasurer, as provided in
section 4012 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236,
MCL 600.4012.
(b) A fee of $6.00 at the time any other writ of garnishment
is served on the state treasurer. However, the fee must be reduced
to $5.00 for each writ of garnishment for individual income tax
refunds or credits that is filed electronically.
Sec. 913. (1) The department of treasury may contract with
private firms to appraise and, if necessary, appeal the assessments
of senior citizen cooperative housing units. Payment for this
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

118
service must be made from the savings that result from the
appraisal or appeal process being conducted by private firms.
(2) The department of treasury may use a portion of the funds
appropriated in part 1 for the senior citizen cooperative housing
tax exemption program for an audit of the program. The department
of treasury shall submit copies of any completed audit report to
the standard report recipients. The department of treasury may use
not more than 1% of the funds for administering and auditing the
program.
Sec. 914. The department of treasury may provide a $200.00
annual prize from the Ehlers internship award account in the gifts,
bequests, and deposit fund to the runner-up of the Rosenthal prize
for interns. The Ehlers internship award account is interest
bearing.
Sec. 915. As required under section 61 of the Michigan
campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.261, there is
appropriated from the general fund to the state campaign fund an
amount equal to the amounts designated for the 2023 tax year.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amount
appropriated does not revert to the general fund and remains in the
state campaign fund. Any amount that remains in the state campaign
fund in excess of $10,000,000.00 on December 31 reverts to the
general fund.
Sec. 916. (1) The department of treasury may make available to
an interested entity a customized list of otherwise unavailable
nonconfidential information regarding unclaimed property that is in
the department of treasury's possession. The department of treasury
shall charge for this information as follows:
(a) For 1 to 100,000 records, 2.5 cents per record.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

119
(b) For 100,001 or more records, 0.5 cents per record.
(2) The revenue received under subsection (1) must be
deposited in the revenue account or fund that is associated with
the applicable unclaimed property.
(3) Not later than June 1, the department of treasury shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients and the senate
and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations
that states the amount of revenue received from the sale of the
information under this section.
Sec. 917. (1) There is appropriated for write-offs and
advances an amount equal to total write-offs and advances for
departmental programs. The amount appropriated under this
subsection must not exceed current year authorizations that would
otherwise lapse to the general fund.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the annual comprehensive
financial report is published, the department of treasury shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients. The report must
include all of the following information for the immediately
preceding fiscal year:
(a) The amounts appropriated for write-offs and advances under
subsection (1).
(b) An explanation for each write-off or advance under
subsection (1).
Sec. 919. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of treasury may contract with private auditing firms to
audit for and collect unclaimed property due this state in
accordance with the uniform unclaimed property act, 1995 PA 29, MCL
567.221 to 567.265. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part
1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

120
necessary to fund auditing and collection costs and fees not to
exceed 12% of the collections or a lesser amount as prescribed by
the applicable contract. The appropriation to fund collection costs
and fees for the auditing and collection of unclaimed property due
this state is from the fund or account to which the revenues being
collected are recorded or dedicated.
(2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives standing committees on
appropriations. The report must include all of the following
information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) The name of each auditing firm that the department of
treasury contracted with under subsection (1).
(b) The amount collected by each of the auditing firms.
(c) The costs of collection.
(d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining
whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued.
Sec. 920. Not later than June 30, from the funds appropriated
in part 1, the department of treasury shall do both of the
following:
(a) Produce a list of all personal property tax reimbursement
payments to be distributed in the current fiscal year by the local
community stabilization authority.
(b) Post the list produced under subdivision (a) on the
department of treasury's public website.
Sec. 921. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of treasury shall, for each revenue administrative
bulletin, administrative rule that involves tax administration or
collection, and notice interpreting a change in law, submit a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

121
notification to every member of the legislature. The department of
treasury shall submit the notification not later than 3 days after
the department of treasury posts the notification. Each
notification must include all of the following:
(a) A summary of the proposed changes from current procedures.
(b) Identification of industries that will or might be
affected by the bulletin, rule, or notice.
(c) A statement of the potential fiscal implications of the
bulletin, rule, or notice. This subdivision does not apply to a
bulletin, rule, or notice that is a routine update of a tax or
interest rate required by statute.
(d) A summary of the reason for the proposed change.
Sec. 924. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
the department of treasury may receive and expend principal
residence audit fund revenue for administration of principal
residence audits under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206,
MCL 211.1 to 211.155.
(2) Not later than December 31, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes the amount of exemptions denied and the revenue received
under the program described in subsection (1) for the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 927. The department of treasury shall submit a progress
report regarding essential service assessment audits to the
standard report recipients. The report must include all of the
following:
(a) The number of audits.
(b) The revenue generated from the audits.
(c) The number of complaints received by the department of
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

122
treasury related to the audits.
Sec. 928. The department of treasury may provide receipt,
check and cash processing, data, collection, investment, fiscal
agent, levy and check cost assessment, writ of garnishment, and
other user services on a contractual basis for other principal
executive departments and state agencies. Funds for the services
provided are appropriated and must be expended for salaries, wages,
fees, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide the services.
Money in the fund that is unobligated at the end of the fiscal year
lapses to the general fund.
Sec. 930. (1) The department of treasury shall provide
accounts receivable collections services to other principal
executive departments and state agencies in accordance with 1927 PA
375, MCL 14.131 to 14.134, or to a city with which the department
of treasury has contracted to provide tax administration services.
The department of treasury shall deduct a fee equal to the cost of
collections from all receipts except for unrestricted general fund
collections. Fees must be credited to a restricted revenue account
and are appropriated to the department of treasury to pay for the
cost of collections. If the department of treasury deducts fees
under this subsection that total an amount that is greater than the
actual cost of the collections, the department of treasury shall
periodically repay the surplus to the respective account. The
department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in
sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection.
(2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes the following information regarding subsection (1) for the
immediately preceding fiscal year:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

123
(a) The principal executive departments and state agencies
served.
(b) The funds collected.
(c) The costs of collection.
Sec. 931. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the appropriation in part 1 to the department of treasury for
treasury fees must be assessed against all restricted funds that
receive common cash earnings or other investment income. This
subsection does not apply to federal or state restricted funds that
are temporary in nature or otherwise do not qualify to be assessed
treasury fees. The fee assessed against each restricted fund must
be based on the size of the restricted fund, calculated as the
absolute value of the average daily cash balance plus the market
value of investments in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and
the level of resources necessary to maintain the restricted fund as
required by each department. Not later than November 30, the
department of treasury shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that identifies the fees assessed against each
restricted fund and the methodology used for the assessment.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of treasury may receive and expend investment fees that
are related to new restricted funding sources that participate in
common cash earnings or other investment income during the current
fiscal year.
(3) As used in this section, "treasury fees" includes all
costs, including administrative overhead, that are related to the
investment of a restricted fund.
Sec. 932. The board of directors of the Michigan education
trust may expend revenue received under the Michigan education
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

124
trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, for necessary
salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment,
worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil
service commission retirement fund and the state employees'
retirement fund.
Sec. 934. (1) The department of treasury may expend revenues
received under the hospital finance authority act, 1969 PA 38, MCL
331.31 to 331.84, the shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL
141.1051 to 141.1076, the higher education facilities authority
act, 1969 PA 295, MCL 390.921 to 390.934, the Michigan public
educational facilities authority, Executive Reorganization Order
No. 2002-3, MCL 12.192, the Michigan tobacco settlement finance
authority act, 2005 PA 226, MCL 129.261 to 129.279, the land bank
fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, part 505 of
the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
451, MCL 324.50501 to 324.50522, the state housing development
authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1401 to 125.1499c, and
the MFA, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194, for
necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services,
equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, grants to the
civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees'
retirement fund, and other expenses as allowed under those acts or
executive reorganization orders.
(2) Not later than January 31, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes both of the following for the immediately preceding fiscal
year:
(a) The amount and purpose of expenditures of $250,000.00 or
more that are made under subsection (1) from funds received by the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

125
department of treasury that are in addition to those appropriated
in part 1.
(b) A list of reimbursement of revenue, if any.
Sec. 935. The position of student loan ombudsman is created in
the department of treasury's advocacy services team. The student
loan ombudsman serves as an advocate for borrowers and shall work
with the financial resource navigator within the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential to provide technical
assistance to individuals taking out or paying off student loans.
Sec. 936. Revenue collected in the state forensic laboratory
fund is appropriated and shall be distributed in accordance with
section 7 of the forensic laboratory funding act, 1994 PA 35, MCL
12.207.
Sec. 937. As a condition of receiving funds in part 1, not
later than March 31, the department of treasury shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients and the senate and house
standing committees on appropriations regarding the department of
treasury's collection efforts for delinquent accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) Information regarding the effectiveness of the department
of treasury's current collection strategies, including the use of
vendors or contractors.
(b) The amount of delinquent accounts.
(c) The liquidation rates for declining delinquent accounts.
(d) The profile of uncollected delinquent accounts, including
specific uncollected amounts by category.
(e) The department of treasury's strategy to manage delinquent
accounts when those accounts exceed the collectible period.
(f) A summary of the strategies used in other states,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

126
including, but not limited to, secondary placement services, and
assessing the benefits of those strategies.
Sec. 938. Revenue collected in the qualified heavy equipment
rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund is
appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 9
of the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property specific
tax act, 2022 PA 35, MCL 211.1129.
Sec. 939. Revenue deposited in the local government
reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in
accordance with section 3a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA
489, MCL 12.253a.
Sec. 940. (1) The election administration support fund is
created in the state treasury.
(2) Any unexpended funds in the election administration
support fund must be carried forward and are available for
expenditure under this section.
(3) Funds may be spent from the election administration
support fund only on appropriation, or legislative transfer
pursuant to section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit in the election administration support fund.
The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the election
administration support fund. The state treasurer shall credit to
the election administration support fund interest and earnings from
the election administration support fund.
(5) Funds in the election administration support fund at the
close of the fiscal year remain in the election administration
support fund and do not lapse to the general fund.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

127
(6) Funds appropriated in part 1 for election administration
support fund must be deposited in the election administration
support fund.
Sec. 941. (1) Not later than November 1, from the funds
appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction
with the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing
committees on appropriations on the annual cost of the MEGA tax
credits. The report must include, for each year from 1995 to the
expiration of the MEGA tax credit program, the board-approved
credit amount, adjusted for credit amendments if applicable, and
the actual and projected value of tax credits. For years for which
credit claims are complete, the report must include the total of
actual certificated credit amounts. For years for which claims are
still pending or not yet submitted, the report must include a
combination of actual credits if available and projected credits.
Credit projections must be based on updated estimates of employees,
wages, and benefits for eligible companies.
(2) In addition to the report under subsection (1), not later
than November 1, the department of treasury, in conjunction with
the MSF, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on
appropriations on the annual cost of all other certificated credits
by program for each year until the credits expire or can no longer
be collected. The report must include estimates on the brownfield
redevelopment credit, film credits, MEGA photovoltaic technology
credit, MEGA polycrystalline silicon manufacturing credit, MEGA
vehicle battery credit, and other certificated credits.
Sec. 944. From the funds appropriated in part 1, if the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

128
department of treasury hires a pension plan consultant using any of
the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury shall
do all of the following:
(a) Retain each report provided to the department of treasury
by that consultant.
(b) Notify the standard report recipients that the department
of treasury has hired a pension plan consultant, including the
reason why the department of treasury hired the pension plan
consultant.
(c) Make a report described in subdivision (a) available to a
standard report recipient if requested by the standard report
recipient.
Sec. 945. From the funds appropriated in part 1, audits of
local unit assessment administration practices, procedures, and
records must be conducted in each assessment jurisdiction a minimum
of 1 time every 5 years and in accordance with section 10g of the
general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.10g.
Sec. 946. Revenue collected in the convention facility
development fund is appropriated and must be distributed in
accordance with sections 8, 9, and 10 of the state convention
facility development act, 1985 PA 106, MCL 207.628, 207.629, and
207.630.
Sec. 947. It is the intent of the legislature that financial
independence teams cooperate with the financial responsibility
section to coordinate and streamline efforts in identifying and
addressing fiscal emergencies in school districts and intermediate
school districts.
Sec. 948. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

129
30, 2027 are estimated at $22,584,500.00. From this amount, total
department of treasury appropriations for pension-related legacy
costs are estimated at $22,584,500.00. Total department of treasury
appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs are estimated
at $0.00.
Sec. 949. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department of treasury may contract with private agencies to
prevent the disbursement of fraudulent tax refunds. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury,
there are appropriated amounts necessary to pay the costs of the
contracts or to fund operations designed to reduce fraudulent
income tax refund payments. The additional amount appropriated
under this subsection must not be greater than $2,000,000.00. The
appropriation to fund fraud prevention efforts under this
subsection is from the fund or account to which the revenues being
collected are recorded or dedicated.
(2) Not later than November 30, the department of treasury
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives standing committees on
appropriations. The report must include all of the following for
the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) The number of refund claims denied because of the fraud
prevention operations.
(b) The amount of refunds denied.
(c) The costs of the fraud prevention operations.
(d) Any other information that is pertinent to determining
whether the authority under subsection (1) should be continued.
Sec. 949a. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for city
income tax administration program, the department of treasury may
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

130
expand its individual income tax administration for any additional
cities that enter into service-level agreements with the department
of treasury for this purpose. In addition to the funds appropriated
in part 1, any additional local funds received as part of the
service-level agreements are appropriated to the department for
staffing and administration of the program.
Sec. 949b. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with
written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and
transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs
for Michigan fund, including tax capture revenues collected for
calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to
authorized businesses and distributions to the MSF for
administrative expenses, are appropriated in accordance with
chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL
125.2090g to 125.2090j.
Sec. 949c. From the funds appropriated in part 1, funds must
be expended in coordination with the department of agriculture and
rural development to improve the timely processing and issuance of
tax credits from the Michigan's farmland and open space
preservation program created under section 36109 of the natural
resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL
324.36109, for the Michigan's farmland and open space preservation
program under parts 361 and 362 of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to
324.36116 and 324.36201 to 324.36207.
Sec. 949d. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
financial review commission, the department of treasury shall
continue financial review commission efforts in the current fiscal
year. The purpose of the funding is to cover ongoing costs
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

131
associated with the operation of the commission.
(2) The department of treasury shall identify specific
outcomes and performance measures for this initiative, including,
but not limited to, the department of treasury's ability to perform
a critical fiscal review to ensure the city of Detroit does not
reenter distress following its exit from bankruptcy and to ensure
that the community district does not enter distress and maintains a
balanced budget.
(3) Not later than March 15, the department of treasury shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes
both of the following:
(a) A description of the specific outcomes and measures
required in subsection (1).
(b) The results and data related to these outcomes and
measures.
Sec. 949e. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the state
essential services assessment program, the department of treasury
shall administer the state essential services assessment program.
The purpose of the program is to provide a phased-in replacement of
locally collected personal property taxes on eligible manufacturing
personal property. The program must provide the department of
treasury with the ability to collect the state essential services
assessment.
Sec. 949f. Revenue from the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA
327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, related to counties with a population
of more than 2,000,000 according to the 2000 federal decennial
census is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with
section 12(2)(e) of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL
205.432.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

132
Sec. 949h. Revenue from part 6 of the medical marihuana
facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605,
is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with part 6
of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL
333.27601 to 333.27605.
Sec. 949i. Revenue from the Michigan Regulation and Taxation
of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, is
appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the
Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL
333.27951 to 333.27967.
Sec. 949j. All funds in the wrongful imprisonment compensation
fund created in the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA
343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757, are appropriated and available for
expenditure. Expenditures are limited to support wrongful
imprisonment compensation payments under section 6 of the wrongful
imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1756.
Sec. 949k. There is appropriated an amount equal to the tax
captured revenues due under approved transformational brownfield
plans created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act,
1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670.
Sec. 949m. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan
infrastructure council shall plan, conduct, and contract for asset
management improvement activities, including, but not limited to,
any of the following:
(a) Infrastructure data collection activities.
(b) Asset manager training.
(c) Development of a 30-year asset management plan for this
state.
(d) Assistance in asset management improvement projects,
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

133
including maintaining an asset management portal.
(e) Any other projects that promote improved asset management
for infrastructure in this state.
Sec. 949n. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
the money in the fostering futures scholarship trust fund,
including any money received as gifts or donations to the fostering
futures scholarship trust fund, is appropriated and the department
of treasury may issue payments in compliance with the fostering
futures scholarship trust fund act, 2008 PA 525, MCL 722.1021 to
722.1031.
Sec. 949o. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report the taxable value and local tax effort for
each city, village, township, and county used to calculate the
revenue sharing payments made under sections 952 and 955 to the
house and senate fiscal agencies, not later than 1 business day
after payments are made under section 954(1) for sections 952 and
955.
Sec. 949p. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1,
any amount collected from maintenance or user fees paid by the plan
participants to the plan vendor or to the plan is authorized to be
spent by the program. The Michigan achieving a better life
experience program fees must be used to develop and conduct a
marketing campaign to promote awareness to residents of this state.
Eligible expenses include, but are not limited to, program
administration, program awareness campaigns, planning and hosting
events, or to reduce or offset plan participant fees.
Sec. 949q. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report the taxable value and local tax effort for
each city, village, township, and county used to calculate the
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

134
revenue sharing payments made under section 952 and section 955 to
the house and senate fiscal agencies not later than 1 business day
after payments are made under section 954(1) for sections 952 and
955.
Sec. 949r. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall not use funds to initiate or pursue the
garnishment of wages or take any other collections measures for
individuals who received unemployment insurance agency overpayments
during the years of 2020 to 2022.
Sec. 949s. (1) The Medicaid caseload reserve fund is created
within the state treasury. The purpose of the fund is to support
Medicaid caseload costs that occur at levels above appropriated
amounts.
(2) Funds may be spent from the Medicaid caseload reserve fund
only upon appropriation.
(3) Interest and earnings from the investment of funds
deposited in the Medicaid caseload reserve fund shall remain in the
fund.
(4) Funds in the Medicaid caseload reserve fund at the close
of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not lapse to
the general fund.
Sec. 949t. (1) The HR-1 costs fund is created within the state
treasury. The purpose of the fund is to support costs that occur as
a result of administering or implementing HR-1, Public Law 119-21.
(2) Funds may be spent from the HR-1 costs fund only upon
appropriation.
(3) Interest and earnings from the investment of funds
deposited in the HR-1 costs fund shall remain in the fund.
(4) Funds in the HR-1 costs fund at the close of a fiscal year
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

135
shall remain in the fund and shall not lapse to the general fund.

REVENUE SHARING
Sec. 950. The department of treasury shall distribute the
funds appropriated in part 1 for constitutional revenue sharing to
cities, villages, and townships, as required under section 10 of
article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Revenue collected in
accordance with section 10 of article IX of the state constitution
of 1963 in excess of the amount appropriated in part 1 for
constitutional revenue sharing is appropriated for distribution to
cities, villages, and townships, on a population basis as required
under section 10 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963.
Sec. 952. The funds appropriated in part 1 for city, village,
and township revenue sharing and collected in the revenue sharing
trust fund created in section 11a of the Michigan trust fund act,
2000 PA 489, MCL 12.261, is appropriated and must be distributed in
accordance with section 11b of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA
489, MCL 12.261.
Sec. 954. (1) Cities, villages, and townships receiving a
payment under section 952 and counties receiving a payment under
section 955 must receive distributions on the dates in accordance
with section 11b of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL
12.261.
(2) Payments distributed under section 952 or section 955 may
be withheld in accordance with sections 17a and 21 of the Glenn
Steil state revenue sharing act of 1971, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.917a
and 141.921.
(3) If a city, village, or township that receives a payment
under section 952 is determined to have a retirement pension
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

136
benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the
protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA
202, MCL 38.2805, the city, village, or township must allocate to
its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the
difference between its current year payment under section 952 and
the amount the city, village or township would have been eligible
to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121, rounded
to the nearest dollar. A city, village, or township that has issued
a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal
finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this
requirement.
(4) If a county that receives a payment under section 955 is
determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in
underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local
government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805,
the county must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an
amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year
payment under section 955 and the amount the county would have been
eligible to receive under section 955 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121,
rounded to the nearest dollar. A county that has issued a municipal
security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act,
2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement.
Sec. 955. The funds appropriated in part 1 for county revenue
sharing and collected in the revenue sharing trust fund created in
section 11a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL
12.261, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with
section 11b of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL
12.261.
Sec. 956. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

137
financially distressed cities, villages, or townships, the
department of treasury shall create and operate a grant program to
award grants to cities, villages, and townships that have 1 or more
conditions that indicate probable financial distress, as determined
by the department of treasury. A city, village, or township with 1
or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress may
apply in a manner determined by the department of treasury for a
grant to pay for specific projects or services that move the city,
village, or township toward financial stability. Grants must be
used for specific projects or services that move the city, village,
or township toward financial stability. The city, village, or
township must use the grants under this section to do 1 or more of
the following:
(a) Make payments to reduce unfunded accrued liability.
(b) Repair or replace critical infrastructure and equipment
owned or maintained by the city, village, or township.
(c) Reduce debt obligations.
(d) Pay for costs associated with a transition to shared
services with another jurisdiction.
(e) Administer other projects that move the city, village, or
township toward financial stability.
(2) The department of treasury shall award not more than
$2,000,000.00 to any city, village, or township under this section.
(3) Not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all
of the following for each grant recipient.
(a) The name of the grant recipient.
(b) The date the grant was approved.
(c) The amount of the grant.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

138
(d) A description of the project or projects that will be paid
by the grant.
(4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
financially distressed cities, villages, or townships are
designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or
unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and
shall be available for expenditure for projects under this section
until the projects have been completed. The following is in
compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to provide assistance to
financially distressed cities, villages, and townships under this
section.
(b) The projects will be accomplished by grants to cities,
villages, and townships approved by the department of treasury.
(c) The total estimated cost of all projects is $2,500,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030.
Sec. 957. A term that is defined in the Glenn Steil state
revenue sharing act, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.901 to 141.921, has the
same meaning when used in sections 950 to 956.
Sec. 959. (1) The department of treasury shall distribute
funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety revenue sharing
grants as provided for in subsection (9) and as follows:
(a) $3,250,000.00 to the MDHHS to establish and administer a
grant program to award funds to community violence intervention
programs.
(b) $35,062,500.00 for a public safety assistance payment to
each city, village, or township. The public safety assistance
payment must be calculated as follows:
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

139
(i) Determine the average violent crime count for each city,
village, and township by adding the 2 highest annual violent crime
counts for each city, village, and township from the 3 most
recently available annual crime reports published by the MDSP as of
the first day of the current fiscal year and dividing by 2.
(ii) Determine the statewide total violent crime count by
summing the average violent crime count for each city, village, and
township as determined under subparagraph (i).
(iii) Determine the proportional factor for each city, village,
and township by dividing the average violent crime count for each
city, village, and township as determined under subparagraph (i) by
the statewide total violent crime count determined under
subparagraph (ii).
(iv) Multiply the proportional factor determined in
subparagraph (iii), for each city, village, and township by the total
amount available for distribution under this subdivision, and round
to the nearest dollar.
(2) A public safety assistance payment to a city, village, or
township as determined under subsection (1)(b) is limited to not
more than 25% of the total amount available for distribution under
subsection (1)(b).
(3) All of the following apply to a distribution under
subsection (1)(b):
(a) A city, village, or township must use the distribution
only for operational and capital expenditures that serve the
purposes of public safety.
(b) Not less than 75% of a public safety assistance payment
distributed under subsection (1)(b) to a city, village, or township
must be used to fund, either directly or indirectly through a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

140
subgrant to another governmental entity, a law enforcement agency
or law enforcement officers as defined in section 2 of the Michigan
commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL
28.602.
(c) Not more than 25% of a public safety assistance payment
distributed under subsection (1)(b) to a city, village, or township
must be used to fund other non-law-enforcement-related public
safety purposes, which include, but are not limited to: public
safety initiatives to improve recruitment or retention efforts;
training programs; equipment purchases; programs designed to reduce
identified risks to public safety; crime diversion programs;
operational emergency medical or firefighter services; or capital
improvements to public safety buildings or structures. All local
public safety initiative expenses must be related to public safety
and designed to reduce identified risks to public safety and cannot
include unproven intervention solutions to community violence.
(d) A distribution made under subsection (1)(b) must not be
used for the following nonoperating expenses:
(i) Pension and other post employee benefit (OPEB) payments.
(ii) Lawsuits and claims payments.
(iii) Debt service payments.
(iv) The acquisition or use of a vehicle weighing more than
15,000 pounds that is designed or used for a tactical police
purpose.
(v) The acquisition or use of facial recognition technology.
(vi) The acquisition or use of a chemical weapon.
(4) A city, village, or township may subgrant all or part of
the distribution under subsection (1)(b) if the subgrant is used
for the purpose of public safety as described under subsection (3).
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

141
(5) Subject to subsections (6), (7), and (8), not later than
November 30, the director of the MDSP shall provide the department
of treasury with a certified list that contains all of the
following:
(a) Base crime level.
(b) Current violent crime counts.
(c) Current violent crime rates, as determined by the director
of the MDSP.
(6) The current violent crime data described in subsection
(5)(b) and (c) mean the calendar year annual violent crime data for
each city, village, and township received and finalized by the MDSP
during the immediately preceding state fiscal year and the 2
immediately preceding calendar years before the immediately
preceding state fiscal year.
(7) Crimes reported by a city, village, township, or reported
by a county on behalf of the city, village, or township, must be
included in the certified list under subsection (5), but crimes
reported by other authorities must be omitted from the certified
list under subsection (5).
(8) The certified list under subsection (5) must contain all
cities, villages, and townships in this state and must report a
zero for cities, villages, and townships that did not submit crime
data.
(9) $11,687,500.00 must be used for public safety assistance
payments to counties. The payment to each county must be calculated
as determined under section 955. All of the following apply to a
distribution made under this subsection:
(a) A county must use the distribution only for operational
and capital expenditures that serve the purposes of public safety.
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

142
(b) Not less than 75% of a public safety assistance payment
distributed to a county under this subsection must be used to fund,
either directly or indirectly through a subgrant to another
governmental entity, a law enforcement agency or law enforcement
officers as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law
enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602.
(c) Not more than 25% of a public safety assistance payment
distributed to a county under this subsection must be used to fund
other non-law-enforcement-related public safety purposes, which
include, but are not limited to: public safety initiatives to
improve recruitment or retention efforts; training programs;
equipment purchases; programs designed to reduce identified risks
to public safety; crime diversion programs; operational emergency
medical or firefighter services; or capital improvements to public
safety buildings or structures. All local public safety initiative
expenses must be related to public safety and designed to reduce
identified risks to public safety and cannot include unproven
intervention solutions to community violence.
(d) A distribution made under this subsection must not be used
for the following nonoperating expenses:
(i) Pension and other post employee benefit (OPEB) payments.
(ii) Lawsuits and claims payments.
(iii) Debt service payments.
(iv) The acquisition or use of a vehicle weighing more than
15,000 pounds that is designed or used for a tactical police
purpose.
(v) The acquisition or use of facial recognition technology.
(vi) The acquisition or use of a chemical weapon.
(10) A county may subgrant all or part of the distribution
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

143
under subsection (9) if the subgrant is used for the purpose of
public safety as described in subsection (9).
(11) As used in subsections (1) to (8):
(a) "Base crime level" means the average of a city, village,
or township's 2 highest annual rates of violent crime, as certified
by the director of the MDSP and determined by the annual crime
reports published by the MDSP in the 3 calendar years immediately
preceding the current calendar year.
(b) "Population" means the counts, as defined by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and used by the director of the MDSP, to
determine the population for each city, village, and township.
(c) "Violent crime" means that term as defined by the director
of the MDSP in accordance with the department's incident crime
reporting program and the corresponding annual crime reports.
(d) "Violent crime count" means the number of violent crimes
based on victim counts, as certified by the director of the MDSP.
When a victim is connected to multiple offenses, the victim is
counted under the highest-ranked offense, as defined by the
director of the MDSP.
(e) "Violent crime rate" means the number of crimes per
100,000 people, determined by dividing a particular city, village,
or township violent crime count by the population, then multiplying
by 100,000 and rounding to the nearest whole number.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Chemical weapon" means a munition or device that is
specifically designed to cause death or other harm through a toxic
chemical that would be released as a result of the employment of
the munition or device.
(b) "Facial recognition technology" means an automated or a
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

144
semiautomated technological process that assists in identifying or
verifying an individual based on the individual's face.
(13) It is the intent of the legislature that $50,000,000.00
be appropriated for the purposes outlined in this section in fiscal
years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028.

BUREAU OF STATE LOTTERY
Sec. 960. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 to
the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated from state
lottery fund revenues the amount necessary for, and directly
related to, implementing and operating lottery games under the
McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL
432.1 to 432.47, and activities under the Traxler-McCauley-Law-
Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152, including
expenditures for contractually mandated payments for vendor
commissions, contractually mandated payments for instant tickets
intended for resale, the contractual costs of providing and
maintaining the online system communications network, and incentive
and bonus payments to lottery retailers.
Sec. 964. For the bureau of state lottery, there is
appropriated 1% of the lottery's immediately preceding fiscal
year's gross sales for promotion and advertising.

MICHIGAN GAMING CONTROL BOARD
Sec. 970. As used in sections 971 to 979:
(a) "Compulsive gaming prevention fund" means the compulsive
gaming prevention fund created in section 3 of the compulsive
gaming prevention act, 1997 PA 70, MCL 432.253.
(b) "Fantasy contest fund" means the fantasy contest fund
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

145
created in section 16 of the fantasy contests consumer protection
act, 2019 PA 157, MCL 432.516.
(c) "First responder presumed coverage fund" means the first
responder presumed coverage fund created in section 405 of the
worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL
418.405.
(d) "Internet gaming fund" means the internet gaming fund
created in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA
152, MCL 432.316.
(e) "Internet sports betting fund" means the internet sports
betting fund created in section 16 of the lawful sports betting
act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416.
Sec. 971. (1) From the revenue collected by the Michigan
gaming control board from the total annual assessment of each
casino licensee, funds are appropriated and must be distributed as
described in section 12a(5) of the Michigan Gaming Control and
Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a.
(2) The revenue collected in the internet sports betting fund
is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the
lawful sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.401 to 432.419.
(3) The revenue collected in the internet gaming fund is
appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the lawful
internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.301 to 432.322, and the
Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to
432.152.
Sec. 972. After all other required expenditures described in
section 16(3) of the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019
PA 157, MCL 432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming
act, 2019 PA 152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

146
sports betting act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416 are made, any money
remaining in the fantasy contest fund, internet gaming fund, and
internet sports betting fund is appropriated and must be deposited
in the state school aid fund as described in section 16(3)(b) of
the fantasy contests consumer protection act, 2019 PA 157, MCL
432.516, section 16(4) of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA
152, MCL 432.316, and section 16(4) of the lawful sports betting
act, 2019 PA 149, MCL 432.416.
Sec. 973. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for local
government programs may be used to provide assistance to a local
revenue sharing board referenced in an agreement authorized by the
Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497.
(2) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1)
shall comply with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to
15.275, and the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231
to 15.246.
(3) A county treasurer may receive and administer funds on
behalf of a local revenue sharing board. Funds appropriated in part
1 for local government programs may be used to audit local revenue
sharing board funds held by a county treasurer. This section does
not limit the ability of local units of government to enter into
agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes to provide
financial assistance to local units of government or to jointly
provide public services.
(4) A local revenue sharing board described in subsection (1)
shall comply with all applicable provisions of any agreement
authorized by the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497,
in which the local revenue sharing board is referenced, including,
but not limited to, the disbursal of tribal casino payments
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

147
received in accordance with applicable provisions of the tribal-
state class III gaming compact under which those funds are
received.
(5) The director of the MDSP and the executive director of the
Michigan gaming control board may assist the local revenue sharing
boards in determining allocations to be made to local public safety
organizations.
(6) Not later than September 30, the Michigan gaming control
board shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and
the senate and house of representatives standing committees on
appropriations on the receipts and distribution of revenues by
local revenue sharing boards.
Sec. 974. If revenues collected in the state services fee fund
created in section 12a of the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue
Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.212a, are less than the amounts
appropriated from the state services fee fund, available revenues
must be used to fully fund the appropriation in part 1 for casino
gaming regulation activities before distributions are made to other
state departments and agencies. If the remaining revenue in the
state services fee fund is insufficient to fully fund
appropriations to other state departments or agencies, the
shortfall must be distributed proportionally among those
departments and agencies.
Sec. 975. In expending the funds appropriated in part 1 for
advertising for responsible gaming, the Michigan gaming control
board shall engage with MDHHS on strategies to support addiction
prevention and education efforts in addition to advertising for
responsible gaming. Not later than September 1, the Michigan gaming
control board shall submit a report to the standard report
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

148
recipients on the expenditures and programming funded from the
appropriations in part 1 for advertising for responsible gaming.
Sec. 976. The executive director of the Michigan gaming
control board may pay rewards of not more than $5,000.00 to a
person who provides information that results in the arrest and
conviction on a felony or misdemeanor charge for a crime that
involves the horse racing industry. A reward paid under this
section must be paid out of the appropriation in part 1 for the
racing commission.
Sec. 977. All appropriations from the equine industry
development fund created in section 20 of the horse racing law of
1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320, except for the racing commission
appropriations, must be reduced proportionately if revenues to the
equine industry development fund decline during the current fiscal
year to a level lower than the amount appropriated in part 1.
Sec. 978. The Michigan gaming control board shall use actual
expenditure data in determining the actual regulatory costs of
conducting racing dates and shall submit a report of that data to
the standard report recipients and the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on agriculture. The Michigan gaming
control board may not be reimbursed for more than the actual
regulatory cost of conducting race dates. In determining actual
costs, the Michigan gaming control board shall take into account
that each specific breed of horse may require different regulatory
mechanisms.
Sec. 979. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
millionaire party regulation, the Michigan gaming control board may
receive and expend internet gaming fund revenue in an amount that
is not more than the amount appropriated in part 1 for necessary
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

149
expenses incurred in the licensing and regulation of millionaire
parties under article 2 of the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo
act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.132 to 432.152. Any unused internet
gaming fund revenues are subject to the distribution requirements
in section 16 of the lawful internet gaming act, 2019 PA 152, MCL
432.316. Not later than March 1, the Michigan gaming control board
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes all of the following:
(a) The total expenditures related to the licensing and
regulating of millionaire parties.
(b) The steps taken to ensure charities are receiving revenue
due to them.
(c) A description of the progress on promulgating rules to
ensure compliance with the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act,
1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152.
(d) Any enforcement actions taken.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 991. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
election equipment reserve fund, the MDTMB shall provide assistance
that may include centralized procurement and information technology
support in the state's implementation of a uniform voting system
and replacement of voting systems in local jurisdictions in
accordance with the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1
to 168.992.
(2) All principal, interest, and earnings deposited into the
election administration support fund created under section 21-940
of article 21, and funds received under the help America vote act
of 2002, 42 USC 15301 to 15545, including any interest and
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

150
earnings, in accordance with 52 USC 20901 to 21145, are
appropriated for purposes described in this section. The MDTMB
shall collaborate with other state departments, as appropriate, on
the implementation of a uniform voting system. The state budget
director may make the budgetary or accounting transactions
necessary to authorize the utilization of these funds in the MDTMB
or any collaborating department.
(3) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for election
equipment reserve fund and this section are designated as a work
project appropriation and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do
not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support the purchase of
election equipment for local units of government.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $43,164,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 992. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local
prosecutor support grants, the department of treasury shall issue
grants to county prosecutors that received a grant under section
991 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, section 805 of article 16 of 2025
PA 22, or section 991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22. The grant
amount must be the greatest amount received under section 991 of
article 5 of 2023 PA 119, section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA 22,
or section 991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
(2) County prosecutors must show that the total amount
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

151
appropriated to the county prosecutor in the current fiscal year is
equal to or greater than the amount received in the previous fiscal
year.
(3) The department of treasury shall issue grants to county
prosecutors not later than 5 business days after receiving
documentation that the total amount appropriated to the county
prosecutors is equal to or greater than the amount received in the
previous fiscal year.
Sec. 993. (1) For the funds appropriated in part 1 for local
prosecutor support adjustment grants, the department of treasury
shall issue adjustment grants to county prosecutors that qualify
under subsection (2) in the amount calculated under subsection (3)
not later than 1 business day after the effective date of this act.
(2) County prosecutors are eligible to receive an adjustment
grant under this section if both of the following conditions are
met:
(a) The county prosecutors received a grant under section 991
of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 or section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA
22.
(b) One of the following conditions is met:
(i) The county prosecutors did not receive an amount under
section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA 22 or section 991(1) of
article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
(ii) The amount that the county prosecutors received under
section 991 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 or section 805 of article
16 of 2025 PA 22 was less than the amount that the county
prosecutors received under section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA 22
or section 991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
(3) The amount of adjustment grants to each county that is
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

152
qualified under subsection (2) must be calculated in the following
manner:
(a) For county prosecutors that received an amount under
section 991 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 that was greater than the
amount received in section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA 22 and
section 991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22, the amount must be the
sum of the amount received in section 991 of article 5 of 2023 PA
119 minus the amount received under section 805 of article 16 of
2025 PA 22, plus the amount received in section 991 of article 5 of
2023 PA 119 minus the amount received under section 991(1) of
article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
(b) For county prosecutors that received an amount under
section 805 of article 16 of 2025 PA 22 that was greater than the
amount received under section 991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22,
the amount calculated must be the amount received in section 805 of
article 16 of 2025 PA 22 minus the amount received under section
991(1) of article 5 of 2025 PA 22.
Sec. 994. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
municipal infrastructure grants, the department of treasury shall
create and operate a grant program to award competitive grants to
cities, villages, townships, and counties to upgrade municipal
facilities that are at least 50 years old.
(2) The department of treasury shall prioritize cities,
villages, townships, or counties that have 1 or more conditions
that indicate probable financial distress as determined by the
department of treasury under section 956.
(3) The department of treasury shall award not more than
$1,000,000.00 to any city, village, township, or county and shall
require that the grant recipient commit at least 25% of the amount
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

153
received to the project.
(4) Not later than March 31, the department of treasury shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes all
of the following for each grant recipient:
(a) The name of the grant recipient.
(b) The date the grant was approved.
(c) The amount of the grant.
(d) A description of the project or projects that will be paid
by the grant.
Sec. 995. (1) For a public safety academy assistance grant
program, the funds appropriated under this subsection must be used
by the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards to do all
of the following:
(a) Administer a competitive public safety academy assistance
scholarship program that provides police academy scholarships of
not more than $20,000.00 per recruit on a first-come, first-served
basis to an individual who meets the requirements of subsection (2)
and any necessary requirements to enroll in a police academy
program.
(b) Pay the salaries of training academy recruits from local
public safety agencies or to pay the salaries of police cadets who
are receiving tuition assistance under subsection (2) and academy
tuition and eligible related costs as determined by the Michigan
commission on law enforcement standards.
(2) In order to receive a scholarship under subsection (1)(a),
an individual must have applied to at least 1 law enforcement basic
training academy approved by the Michigan commission on law
enforcement standards, have completed an interview, and have
received approval for the scholarship from the public safety agency
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

154
that the individual intends to serve.
(3) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a), not more than 25
scholarships may be approved for a particular public safety agency.
(4) The Michigan commission on law enforcement standards may
use not more than $140,000.00 for administration of the scholarship
program established and administered by the Michigan commission on
law enforcement standards under subsection (1).
(5) The Michigan commission on law enforcement standards may
set any necessary additional requirements for the distribution of
the funds disbursed under subsection (1).

STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY
Sec. 1100. (1) Subject to section 242 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1242, and on the approval of the
state building authority, the department of treasury may expend
from the general fund of this state during the fiscal year an
amount necessary to meet the cash flow requirements of those state
building authority projects solely for lease to a state agency
identified in both part 1 and this section, and for which state
building authority bonds or notes have not been issued, and for the
sole acquisition by the state building authority of equipment and
furnishings for lease to a state agency as permitted by 1964 PA
183, MCL 830.411 to 830.425, for which the issuance of bonds or
notes is authorized by an appropriations PA that is effective for
the immediately preceding fiscal year. Any general fund advances
for which state building authority bonds have not been issued must
bear an interest cost to the state building authority at a rate
that is not greater than the rate earned by the state treasurer's
common cash fund during the period in which the advances are
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

155
outstanding and are repaid to the general fund of this state.
(2) On sale of bonds or notes for the projects identified in
part 1 or for equipment as authorized by an appropriations PA and
in this section, the state building authority shall credit the
general fund of this state an amount equal to the amount expended
from the general fund plus interest, if any, as described in this
section.
(3) For state building authority projects for which bonds or
notes have been issued and on the request of the state building
authority, the state treasurer shall make advances without interest
from the general fund as necessary to meet cash flow requirements
for the projects. The state building authority shall reimburse the
state treasurer for the advances when the investments earmarked for
the financing of the projects mature.
(4) If a project identified in part 1 is terminated after
final design is complete, advances made on behalf of the state
building authority for the costs of final design must be repaid to
the general fund in a manner recommended by the director of the
state building authority.
Sec. 1102. (1) The state building authority shall not release
state building authority funding to a university or community
college to finance the construction or renovation of a facility
that collects revenue in excess of money required for the operation
of that facility unless the university or community college agrees
to use that excess revenue to reimburse the state building
authority. The excess revenue received by the state building
authority as reimbursement must be credited to the general fund to
offset rent obligations associated with the retirement of bonds
issued for the applicable facility. The auditor general shall
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

156
annually identify and audit the facilities that are subject to this
section. Costs associated with the administration of the audit must
be charged against money received by the state building authority
as reimbursement under this section.
(2) As used in this section, "revenue" includes state
appropriations, facility opening money, other state aid, indirect
cost reimbursement, and other revenue generated by the activities
of the facility.
Sec. 1103. Not later than October 15, the state building
authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects
associated with state building authority bonds as of the end of the
immediately preceding fiscal year. Not later than 30 days after a
refinancing or restructuring bond issue is sold, the state building
authority shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
and the JCOS regarding the status of construction projects
associated with that bond issue. Each report must include all of
the following:
(a) A list of all completed construction projects for which
state building authority bonds have been sold, and which bonds are
currently active.
(b) A list of all projects under construction for which sale
of state building authority bonds is pending.
(c) A list of all projects authorized for construction or
identified in an appropriations act for which approval of
schematic/preliminary plans or total authorized cost is pending
that have state building authority bonds identified as a source of
financing.

BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

157
REVENUE STATEMENT
Sec. 1201. In accordance with section 18 of article V of the
state constitution of 1963, fund balances and estimates are
presented in the following statement:
BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS BY OPERATING FUNDS
(Amounts in millions)
Fiscal Year 2026-2027
Beginning Estimated Ending
Balance Revenue Balance
OPERATING FUNDS
General fund/general purpose 319.7 13,310.0 19.9
School aid fund 753.3 21,974.0 2.0
Federal aid 0.0 31,047.2 0.0
Transportation funds 0.0 10,904.4 0.0
Special revenue funds 3,738.5 9,442.3 3,287.0
Other funds 1,817.2 54.2 1,871.4

TOTALS $6,628.7 $86,732.1 $5,180.3


PART 2A

PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS

FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026


GENERAL SECTIONS

Sec. 2201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state

constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under

part 1A for fiscal year 2025-2026 is $4,000,000.00 and state

spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government

for fiscal year 2025-2026 is $0.00.

Sec. 2202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk

158
under this part and the departments, commissions, boards, offices,
and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and
part 1A are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.
Sec. 2203. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under this act, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within this act for the
particular department, board, commission, office, or institution.

EXECUTIVE OFFICE
Sec. 2301. From the funds appropriated in part 1A for
executive office, not less than $2,000,000.00 must be used to
support the implementation of Senate Bill No. 1 and Senate Bill No.
2 of the 103rd Legislature.

LEGISLATURE
Sec. 2401. From the funds appropriated in part 1A for senate,
not less than $1,000,000.00 must be used to support the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 1 and Senate Bill No. 2 of the
103rd Legislature.
Sec. 2402. From the funds appropriated in part 1A for house of
representatives, not less than $1,000,000.00 must be used to
support the implementation of Senate Bill No. 1 and Senate Bill No.
2 of the 103rd Legislature.
Final Page
BJH S06107'26 (S-1) 6tdzhk